Florida, session 2026, SB480.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 396 397 Section 1.âAll duties, functions, records, pending issues, 398 existing contracts, administrative authority, and administrative 399 rules relating to the Florida Digital Service are transferred by 400 a type two transfer, as described in s. 20.06, Florida Statutes, 401 to the Division of Integrated Government Innovation and 402 Technology as created by this act. Any unexpended balances of 403 appropriations, allocations, and other public funds will revert 404 or will be appropriated or allocated as provided in the General 405 Appropriations Act or otherwise by law. 406 Section 2.âSection 14.205, Florida Statutes, is created to 407 read: 408 14.205âDivision of Integrated Government Innovation and 409 Technology.â 410 (1)âThe Division of Integrated Government Innovation and 411 Technology is established within the Executive Office of the 412 Governor. The division shall be a separate budget entity, as 413 provided in the General Appropriations Act, and shall prepare 414 and submit a budget request in accordance with chapter 216. The 415 division shall be responsible for all professional, technical, 416 and administrative support functions necessary to carry out its 417 responsibilities under chapter 282 and as otherwise provided in 418 law. 419 (2)(a)âThe director of the division shall serve as the 420 state chief information officer. The director shall be appointed 421 by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate. The 422 state chief information officer is prohibited from having any 423 financial, personal, or business conflicts of interest related 424 to technology vendors, contractors, or other information 425 technology service providers doing business with the state. 426 (b)âThe state chief information officer must meet the 427 following qualifications: 428 1.âEducation requirements.âThe state chief information 429 officer must meet one of the following criteria: 430 a.âHold a bachelorâs degree from an accredited institution 431 in information technology, computer science, business 432 administration, public administration, or a related field; or 433 b.âHold a masterâs degree in any of the fields listed in 434 sub-subparagraph a., which may be substituted for a portion of 435 the professional experience requirements in subparagraph 2. 436 2.âProfessional experience requirements.âThe state chief 437 information officer must have at least 10 years of progressively 438 responsible experience in information technology management, 439 digital transformation, cybersecurity, or information technology 440 governance, including: 441 a.âA minimum of 5 years in an executive or senior 442 leadership role, overseeing information technology strategy, 443 operations, or enterprise technology management, in either the 444 public or private sector; 445 b.âManaging large-scale information technology projects, 446 enterprise infrastructure, and implementation of emerging 447 technologies; 448 c.âBudget planning, procurement oversight, and financial 449 management of information technology investments; and 450 d.âWorking with state and federal information technology 451 regulations, digital services, and cybersecurity compliance 452 frameworks. 453 3.âTechnical and policy expertise.âThe state chief 454 information officer must have demonstrated expertise in: 455 a.âCybersecurity and data protection by demonstrating 456 knowledge of cybersecurity risk management, compliance with the 457 National Institute of Standards and Technology Cybersecurity 458 Framework, ISO 27001, and applicable federal and state security 459 regulations; 460 b.âCloud and digital services with experience in cloud 461 computing, enterprise systems modernization, digital 462 transformation, and emerging information technology trends; 463 c.âInformation technology governance and policy development 464 by demonstrating an understanding of statewide information 465 technology governance structures, digital services, and 466 information technology procurement policies; and 467 d.âPublic sector information technology management by 468 demonstrating familiarity with government information technology 469 funding models, procurement requirements, and legislative 470 processes affecting information technology strategy. 471 4.âLeadership and administrative competencies.âThe state 472 chief information officer must demonstrate: 473 a.âStrategic vision and innovation by possessing the 474 capability to modernize information technology systems, drive 475 digital transformation, and align information technology 476 initiatives with state goals; 477 b.âCollaboration and engagement with stakeholders by 478 working with legislators, state agency heads, local governments, 479 and private sector partners to implement information technology 480 initiatives; 481 c.âCrisis management and cyber resilience by possessing the 482 capability to develop and lead cyber incident response, disaster 483 recovery, and information technology continuity plans; and 484 d.âFiscal management and budget expertise managing multi 485 million-dollar information technology budgets, cost-control 486 strategies, and financial oversight of information technology 487 projects. 488 (3)âThe deputy director of the division shall serve as the 489 deputy chief information officer. 490 (4)âThe director shall select separate individuals to serve 491 as the state chief information security officer, state chief 492 data officer, state chief technology officer, and state chief 493 technology procurement officer. 494 Section 3.âUntil a state chief information officer is 495 appointed pursuant to s. 14.205, Florida Statutes, the current 496 state chief information officer of the Department of Management 497 Services shall be transferred to the Division of Integrated 498 Government Innovation and Technology and serve as interim state 499 chief information officer. A state chief information officer for 500 the Division of Integrated Government Innovation and Technology 501 must be appointed by the Governor by June 30, 2027. 502 Section 4.âSubsection (6) of section 20.055, Florida 503 Statutes, is amended to read: 504 20.055âAgency inspectors general.â 505 (6)âIn carrying out the auditing duties and 506 responsibilities of this act, each inspector general shall 507 review and evaluate internal controls necessary to ensure the 508 fiscal accountability of the state agency. The inspector general 509 shall conduct financial, compliance, electronic data processing, 510 and performance audits of the agency and prepare audit reports 511 of his or her findings. The scope and assignment of the audits 512 are shall be determined by the inspector general; however, the 513 agency head may at any time request the inspector general to 514 perform an audit of a special program, function, or 515 organizational unit. In addition to the duties prescribed in 516 this section, each inspector general annually shall review and 517 report on whether agency practices related to information 518 technology reporting, projects, contracts, and procurements are 519 consistent with the applicable reporting requirements and 520 standards published by the Division of Integrated Government 521 Innovation and Technology within the Executive Office of the 522 Governor. The inspector general shall prepare an annual agency 523 information technology compliance report that assesses the 524 adequacy of internal controls, documentation, and implementation 525 processes to ensure conformity with statewide information 526 technology governance, security, and performance standards. The 527 performance of the audits is audit shall be under the direction 528 of the inspector general, except that if the inspector general 529 does not possess the qualifications specified in subsection (4), 530 the director of auditing must shall perform the functions listed 531 in this subsection. 532 (a)âSuch audits must shall be conducted in accordance with 533 the current International Standards for the Professional 534 Practice of Internal Auditing as published by the Institute of 535 Internal Auditors, Inc., or, where appropriate, in accordance 536 with generally accepted governmental auditing standards. All 537 audit reports issued by internal audit staff must shall include 538 a statement that the audit was conducted pursuant to the 539 appropriate standards. 540 (b)âAudit workpapers and reports are shall be public 541 records to the extent that they do not include information which 542 has been made confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 543 119.07(1) pursuant to law. However, when the inspector general 544 or a member of the staff receives from an individual a complaint 545 or information that falls within the definition provided in s. 546 112.3187(5), the name or identity of the individual may not be 547 disclosed to anyone else without the written consent of the 548 individual, unless the inspector general determines that such 549 disclosure is unavoidable during the course of the audit or 550 investigation. 551 (c)âThe inspector general and the staff shall have access 552 to any records, data, and other information of the state agency 553 he or she deems necessary to carry out his or her duties. The 554 inspector general may also request such information or 555 assistance as may be necessary from the state agency or from any 556 federal, state, or local government entity. 557 (d)âAt the conclusion of each audit, the inspector general 558 shall submit preliminary findings and recommendations to the 559 person responsible for supervision of the program function or 560 operational unit who shall respond to any adverse findings 561 within 20 working days after receipt of the preliminary 562 findings. Such response and the inspector generalâs rebuttal to 563 the response must shall be included in the final audit report. 564 (e)âAt the conclusion of an audit in which the subject of 565 the audit is a specific entity contracting with the state or an 566 individual substantially affected, if the audit is not 567 confidential or otherwise exempt from disclosure by law, the 568 inspector general must shall, consistent with s. 119.07(1), 569 submit the findings to the entity contracting with the state or 570 the individual substantially affected, who must shall be advised 571 in writing that they may submit a written response within 20 572 working days after receipt of the findings. The response and the 573 inspector generalâs rebuttal to the response, if any, must be 574 included in the final audit report. 575 (f)âThe inspector general shall submit the final report to 576 the agency head, the Auditor General, and, for state agencies 577 under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief Inspector 578 General. 579 1.âThe agency information technology compliance reports 580 must be submitted to the agency head, the Auditor General, and, 581 for state agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the 582 Chief Inspector General by September 30 of each year. 583 2.âThe Chief Inspector General shall review the annual 584 agency information technology compliance reports submitted by 585 agency inspectors general under the jurisdiction of the 586 Governor, and shall prepare a consolidated statewide information 587 technology compliance report summarizing agency performance, 588 findings, and recommendations for improvement. The consolidated 589 report must be submitted to the Executive Office of the 590 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 591 House of Representatives by December 1 of each year. 592 3.âAgency heads for agencies not under the jurisdiction of 593 the Governor shall submit the annual agency information 594 technology compliance reports to the Executive Office of the 595 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 596 House of Representatives by December 1 of each year. 597 (g)âThe Auditor General, in connection with the independent 598 postaudit of the same agency pursuant to s. 11.45, shall give 599 appropriate consideration to internal audit reports and the 600 resolution of findings therein. The Legislative Auditing 601 Committee may inquire into the reasons or justifications for 602 failure of the agency head to correct the deficiencies reported 603 in internal audits that are also reported by the Auditor General 604 and shall take appropriate action. 605 (h)âThe inspector general shall monitor the implementation 606 of the state agencyâs response to any report on the state agency 607 issued by the Auditor General or by the Office of Program Policy 608 Analysis and Government Accountability. No later than 6 months 609 after the Auditor General or the Office of Program Policy 610 Analysis and Government Accountability publishes a report on the 611 state agency, the inspector general shall provide a written 612 response to the agency head or, for state agencies under the 613 jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief Inspector General on the 614 status of corrective actions taken. The inspector general shall 615 file a copy of such response with the Legislative Auditing 616 Committee. 617 (i)âThe inspector general shall develop long-term and 618 annual audit plans based on the findings of periodic risk 619 assessments. The plan, where appropriate, should include 620 postaudit samplings of payments and accounts. The plan must 621 shall show the individual audits to be conducted during each 622 year and related resources to be devoted to the respective 623 audits. The plan must shall include a specific cybersecurity 624 audit plan. The Chief Financial Officer, to assist in fulfilling 625 the responsibilities for examining, auditing, and settling 626 accounts, claims, and demands pursuant to s. 17.03(1), and 627 examining, auditing, adjusting, and settling accounts pursuant 628 to s. 17.04, may use audits performed by the inspectors general 629 and internal auditors. For state agencies under the jurisdiction 630 of the Governor, the audit plans must shall be submitted to the 631 Chief Inspector General. The plan must shall be submitted to the 632 agency head for approval. A copy of the approved plan must shall 633 be submitted to the Auditor General. 634 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 635 97.0525, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 636 97.0525âOnline voter registration.â 637 (3) 638 (b)âThe division shall conduct a comprehensive risk 639 assessment of the online voter registration system every 2 640 years. The comprehensive risk assessment must comply with the 641 risk assessment methodology developed by the Division of 642 Integrated Government Innovation and Technology within the 643 Executive Office of the Governor Department of Management 644 Services for identifying security risks, determining the 645 magnitude of such risks, and identifying areas that require 646 safeguards. In addition, the comprehensive risk assessment must 647 incorporate all of the following: 648 1.âLoad testing and stress testing to ensure that the 649 online voter registration system has sufficient capacity to 650 accommodate foreseeable use, including during periods of high 651 volume of website users in the week immediately preceding the 652 book-closing deadline for an election. 653 2.âScreening of computers and networks used to support the 654 online voter registration system for malware and other 655 vulnerabilities. 656 3.âEvaluation of database infrastructure, including 657 software and operating systems, in order to fortify defenses 658 against cyberattacks. 659 4.âIdentification of any anticipated threats to the 660 security and integrity of data collected, maintained, received, 661 or transmitted by the online voter registration system. 662 Section 6.âParagraphs (a) and (f) of subsection (1), 663 paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (2), and subsections (3) 664 and (4) of section 112.22, Florida Statutes, are amended to 665 read: 666 112.22âUse of applications from foreign countries of 667 concern prohibited.â 668 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 669 (a)ââDIGITâ means the Division of Integrated Government 670 Innovation and Technology within the Executive Office of the 671 Governor âDepartmentâ means the Department of Management 672 Services. 673 (f)ââProhibited applicationâ means an application that 674 meets the following criteria: 675 1.âAny Internet application that is created, maintained, or 676 owned by a foreign principal and that participates in activities 677 that include, but are not limited to: 678 a.âCollecting keystrokes or sensitive personal, financial, 679 proprietary, or other business data; 680 b.âCompromising e-mail and acting as a vector for 681 ransomware deployment; 682 c.âConducting cyber-espionage against a public employer; 683 d.âConducting surveillance and tracking of individual 684 users; or 685 e.âUsing algorithmic modifications to conduct 686 disinformation or misinformation campaigns; or 687 2.âAny Internet application that DIGIT the department deems 688 to present a security risk in the form of unauthorized access to 689 or temporary unavailability of the public employerâs records, 690 digital assets, systems, networks, servers, or information. 691 (2) 692 (b)âA person, including an employee or officer of a public 693 employer, may not download or access any prohibited application 694 on any government-issued device. 695 1.âThis paragraph does not apply to a law enforcement 696 officer as defined in s. 943.10(1) if the use of the prohibited 697 application is necessary to protect the public safety or conduct 698 an investigation within the scope of his or her employment. 699 2.âA public employer may request a waiver from DIGIT the 700 department to allow designated employees or officers to download 701 or access a prohibited application on a government-issued 702 device. 703 (c)âWithin 15 calendar days after DIGIT the department 704 issues or updates its list of prohibited applications pursuant 705 to paragraph (3)(a), an employee or officer of a public employer 706 who uses a government-issued device must remove, delete, or 707 uninstall any prohibited applications from his or her 708 government-issued device. 709 (3)âDIGIT The department shall do all of the following: 710 (a)âCompile and maintain a list of prohibited applications 711 and publish the list on its website. DIGIT The department shall 712 update this list quarterly and shall provide notice of any 713 update to public employers. 714 (b)âEstablish procedures for granting or denying requests 715 for waivers pursuant to subparagraph (2)(b)2. The request for a 716 waiver must include all of the following: 717 1.âA description of the activity to be conducted and the 718 state interest furthered by the activity. 719 2.âThe maximum number of government-issued devices and 720 employees or officers to which the waiver will apply. 721 3.âThe length of time necessary for the waiver. Any waiver 722 granted pursuant to subparagraph (2)(b)2. must be limited to a 723 timeframe of no more than 1 year, but DIGIT the department may 724 approve an extension. 725 4.âRisk mitigation actions that will be taken to prevent 726 access to sensitive data, including methods to ensure that the 727 activity does not connect to a state system, network, or server. 728 5.âA description of the circumstances under which the 729 waiver applies. 730 (4)(a)âNotwithstanding s. 120.74(4) and (5), the department 731 is authorized, and all conditions are deemed met, to adopt 732 emergency rules pursuant to s. 120.54(4) and to implement 733 paragraph (3)(a). Such rulemaking must occur initially by filing 734 emergency rules within 30 days after July 1, 2023. 735 (b)âDIGIT The department shall adopt rules necessary to 736 administer this section. 737 Section 7.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 738 119.0725, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 739 119.0725âAgency cybersecurity information; public records 740 exemption; public meetings exemption.â 741 (5)(a)âInformation made confidential and exempt pursuant to 742 this section must shall be made available to a law enforcement 743 agency, the Auditor General, the Cybercrime Office of the 744 Department of Law Enforcement, the Division of Integrated 745 Government Innovation and Technology within the Executive Office 746 of the Governor Florida Digital Service within the Department of 747 Management Services, and, for agencies under the jurisdiction of 748 the Governor, the Chief Inspector General. 749 Section 8.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) and subsection 750 (7) of section 216.023, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 751 216.023âLegislative budget requests to be furnished to 752 Legislature by agencies.â 753 (4)(a)âThe legislative budget request for each program must 754 contain: 755 1.âThe constitutional or statutory authority for a program, 756 a brief purpose statement, and approved program components. 757 2.âInformation on expenditures for 3 fiscal years (actual 758 prior-year expenditures, current-year estimated expenditures, 759 and agency budget requested expenditures for the next fiscal 760 year) by appropriation category. 761 3.âDetails on trust funds and fees. 762 4.âThe total number of positions (authorized, fixed, and 763 requested). 764 5.âAn issue narrative describing and justifying changes in 765 amounts and positions requested for current and proposed 766 programs for the next fiscal year. 767 6.âInformation resource requests. 768 7.âSupporting information, including applicable cost 769 benefit analyses, business case analyses, performance 770 contracting procedures, service comparisons, and impacts on 771 performance standards for any request to outsource or privatize 772 agency functions. The cost-benefit and business case analyses 773 must include an assessment of the impact on each affected 774 activity from those identified in accordance with paragraph (b). 775 Performance standards must include standards for each affected 776 activity and be expressed in terms of the associated unit of 777 activity. 778 8.âAn evaluation of major outsourcing and privatization 779 initiatives undertaken during the last 5 fiscal years having 780 aggregate expenditures exceeding $10 million during the term of 781 the contract. The evaluation must include an assessment of 782 contractor performance, a comparison of anticipated service 783 levels to actual service levels, and a comparison of estimated 784 savings to actual savings achieved. Consolidated reports issued 785 by the Department of Management Services may be used to satisfy 786 this requirement. 787 9.âSupporting information for any proposed consolidated 788 financing of deferred-payment commodity contracts including 789 guaranteed energy performance savings contracts. Supporting 790 information must also include narrative describing and 791 justifying the need, baseline for current costs, estimated cost 792 savings, projected equipment purchases, estimated contract 793 costs, and return on investment calculation. 794 10.âFor projects that exceed $10 million in total cost, the 795 statutory reference of the existing policy or the proposed 796 substantive policy that establishes and defines the projectâs 797 governance structure, planned scope, main business objectives 798 that must be achieved, and estimated completion timeframes. The 799 governance structure for information technology-related projects 800 must incorporate the applicable project management and oversight 801 standards established pursuant to s. 282.0061 s. 282.0051. 802 Information technology budget requests for the continuance of 803 existing hardware and software maintenance agreements, renewal 804 of existing software licensing agreements, or the replacement of 805 desktop units with new technology that is similar to the 806 technology currently in use are exempt from this requirement. 807 (7)âAs part of the legislative budget request, each state 808 agency and the judicial branch shall include an inventory of all 809 ongoing technology-related projects that have a cumulative 810 estimated or realized cost of more than $1 million. The 811 inventory must, at a minimum, contain all of the following 812 information: 813 (a)âThe name of the technology system. 814 (b)âA brief description of the purpose and function of the 815 system. 816 (c)âA brief description of the goals of the project. 817 (d)âThe initiation date of the project. 818 (e)âThe key performance indicators for the project. 819 (f)âAny other metrics for the project evaluating the health 820 and status of the project. 821 (g)âThe original and current baseline estimated end dates 822 of the project. 823 (h)âThe original and current estimated costs of the 824 project. 825 (i)âTotal funds appropriated or allocated to the project 826 and the current realized cost for the project by fiscal year. 827 828 For purposes of this subsection, an ongoing technology-related 829 project is one which has been funded or has had or is expected 830 to have expenditures in more than one fiscal year. An ongoing 831 technology-related project does not include the continuance of 832 existing hardware and software maintenance agreements, the 833 renewal of existing software licensing agreements, or the 834 replacement of desktop units with new technology that is 835 substantially similar to the technology being replaced. This 836 subsection expires July 1, 2026. 837 Section 9.âPresent subsections (36), (37), and (38) of 838 section 282.0041, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 839 subsections (37), (38), and (39), respectively, new subsections 840 (11) and (36) are added to that section, and subsection (1), 841 present subsection (7), and subsections (27) and (29) of that 842 section are amended, to read: 843 282.0041âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 844 (1)ââAgency assessmentâ means the amount each customer 845 entity must pay annually for services from the Department of 846 Management Services and includes administrative and data center 847 services costs. 848 (6)(7)ââCustomer entityâ means an entity that obtains 849 services from DIGIT the Department of Management Services. 850 (11)ââDIGITâ means the Division of Integrated Government 851 Innovation and Technology within the Executive Office of the 852 Governor. 853 (27)ââProject oversightâ means an independent review and 854 assessment analysis of an information technology project that 855 provides information on the projectâs scope, completion 856 timeframes, and budget and that identifies and quantifies issues 857 or risks affecting the successful and timely completion of the 858 project. 859 (29)ââRisk assessmentâ means the process of identifying 860 operational risks and security risks, determining their 861 magnitude, and identifying areas needing safeguards. 862 (36)ââTechnical debtâ means the accumulated cost and 863 operational impact resulting from the use of suboptimal, 864 expedient, or outdated technology solutions that require future 865 remediation, refactoring, or replacement to ensure 866 maintainability, security, efficiency, and compliance with 867 enterprise architecture standards. 868 Section 10.âSection 282.00515, Florida Statutes, is amended 869 to read: 870 282.00515âDuties of Cabinet agencies.â 871 (1)(a)âThe Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 872 Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 873 Consumer Services shall adopt the standards, best practices, 874 processes, and methodologies established in s. 282.0061(4) and 875 (5)(b) and (d). However, such departments may s. 282.0051(1)(b), 876 (c), and (r) and (3)(e) or adopt alternative standards, best 877 practices, and methodologies that must be based on industry 878 recognized best practices and industry standards that enable 879 allow for open data exchange, interoperability, and vendor 880 neutral integration. Such departments shall evaluate the 881 adoption of alternative standards on a case-by-case basis for 882 each standard, project, or system and reevaluate such 883 alternative standards periodically. 884 (b)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), if an enterprise project 885 has a measurable impact on, or requires participation from, a 886 state agency and the Department of Legal Affairs, the Department 887 of Financial Services, or the Department of Agriculture and 888 Consumer Services, then the Department of Legal Affairs, the 889 Department of Financial Services, or the Department of 890 Agriculture and Consumer Services, as applicable, must follow 891 the standards established under this chapter. 892 (2)âIf the Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 893 Financial Services, or the Department of Agriculture and 894 Consumer Services adopts alternative standards, best practices, 895 processes, and methodologies in lieu of the enterprise 896 architecture standards, best practices, processes, and 897 methodologies adopted pursuant to s. 282.0061(4) and (5)(b) and 898 (d) s. 282.0051, such department must notify DIGIT, the 899 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 900 House of Representatives in writing of the adoption of the 901 alternative standards and provide a justification for adoption 902 of the alternative standards and explain the manner in which how 903 the agency will achieve the policy, standard, guideline, or best 904 practice while promoting open data interoperability. 905 (3)âThe Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 906 Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 907 Consumer Services shall each conduct a full baseline needs 908 assessment to document their respective technical environments, 909 existing technical debt, security risks, and compliance with 910 adopted information technology best practices, guidelines, and 911 standards, similar to the assessments conducted by DIGIT 912 pursuant to s. 282.0061(2)(a) and (b). The Department of Legal 913 Affairs, the Department of Financial Services, and the 914 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may contract 915 with DIGIT to assist with or complete the assessments. 916 (4)âThe Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 917 Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 918 Consumer Services shall each produce a phased roadmap for 919 strategic planning to address known technology gaps and 920 deficiencies, similar to the assessments conducted by DIGIT 921 pursuant to s. 282.0061(2)(d). The phased roadmap must be 922 submitted annually with legislative budget requests required 923 under s. 216.023. The Department of Legal Affairs, the 924 Department of Financial Services, and the Department of 925 Agriculture and Consumer Services may contract with DIGIT to 926 assist with or complete the phased roadmap. 927 (5)âThe Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 928 Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 929 Consumer Services may, but are not required to, contract with 930 DIGIT the department to provide procurement advisory and review 931 services for information technology projects as provided in s. 932 282.0061(5)(a) or perform any of the services and functions 933 described in s. 282.0051. 934 (6)âThe Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 935 Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 936 Consumer Services shall use the information technology reports 937 developed by DIGIT pursuant to s. 282.0061(5)(f) and follow the 938 streamlined reporting process pursuant to s. 282.0061(5)(i). The 939 Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of Financial 940 Services, and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 941 Services shall report annually to the President of the Senate 942 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by December 15 943 information related to the respective department similar to the 944 information required under s. 282.006(6)(a) and the information 945 technology financial data methodology and reporting required by 946 s. 282.0061(6). The Department of Legal Affairs, the Department 947 of Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 948 Consumer Services may provide the report required under this 949 subsection collectively with DIGIT or shall report separately to 950 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 951 the House of Representatives. 952 (7)(a)(4)(a)âNothing in this chapter section or in s. 953 282.0051 requires the Department of Legal Affairs, the 954 Department of Financial Services, or the Department of 955 Agriculture and Consumer Services to integrate with information 956 technology outside its own department or with DIGIT the Florida 957 Digital Service. 958 (b)âDIGIT The department, acting through the Florida 959 Digital Service, may not retrieve or disclose any data without a 960 shared-data agreement in place between DIGIT the department and 961 the Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of Financial 962 Services, or the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 963 Services. 964 (8)âNotwithstanding s. 282.0061(5)(h), DIGIT may perform 965 project oversight only on information technology projects of the 966 Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of Financial 967 Services, and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 968 Services which have a project cost of $20 million or more. Such 969 information technology projects must also comply with the 970 applicable information technology architecture, project 971 management and oversight, and reporting standards established by 972 DIGIT. DIGIT shall report by the 30th day after the end of each 973 quarter to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the 974 House of Representatives on any information technology project 975 under this subsection which DIGIT identifies as high risk. The 976 report must include a risk assessment, including fiscal risks, 977 associated with proceeding to the next stage of the project, and 978 a recommendation for any corrective action required, including 979 suspension or termination of the project. 980 (9)âIf an information technology project implemented by a 981 state agency must be connected to or otherwise accommodated by 982 an information technology system administered by the Department 983 of Legal Affairs, the Department of Financial Services, or the 984 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the state 985 agency must consult with DIGIT regarding the risks and other 986 effects of such project on the information technology systems of 987 the Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of Financial 988 Services, or the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 989 Services, as applicable, and must work cooperatively with the 990 Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of Financial 991 Services, or the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 992 Services, as applicable, regarding connections, interfaces, 993 timing, or accommodations required to implement such project. 994 Section 11.âSection 282.006, Florida Statutes, is created 995 to read: 996 282.006âDivision of Integrated Government Innovation and 997 Technology; enterprise responsibilities; reporting.â 998 (1)âThe Division of Integrated Government Innovation and 999 Technology established in s. 14.205 is the state organization 1000 for information technology governance and is the lead entity 1001 responsible for understanding the unique state agency 1002 information technology needs and environments, creating 1003 technology standards and strategy, supporting state agency 1004 technology efforts, and reporting on the status of technology 1005 for state agencies. 1006 (2)âThe Legislature intends for DIGIT policy, standards, 1007 guidance, and oversight to allow for adaptability to emerging 1008 technology and organizational needs while maintaining compliance 1009 with industry best practices. All policies, standards, and 1010 guidelines established pursuant to this chapter must be 1011 technology-agnostic and may not prescribe specific tools, 1012 platforms, or vendors. 1013 (3)âDIGIT shall establish the strategic direction of 1014 information technology for state agencies. DIGIT shall develop 1015 and publish information technology policy that aligns with 1016 industry best practices for the management of the stateâs 1017 information technology resources. The policy must be updated as 1018 necessary to meet the requirements of this chapter and 1019 advancements in technology. 1020 (4)âDIGIT shall, in coordination with state agency 1021 technology subject matter experts, develop, publish, and 1022 maintain an enterprise architecture that: 1023 (a)âAcknowledges the unique needs of the entities within 1024 the enterprise in the development and publication of standards 1025 and terminologies to facilitate digital interoperability; 1026 (b)âSupports the cloud-first policy as specified in s. 1027 282.206; 1028 (c)âAddresses the manner in which information technology 1029 infrastructure may be modernized to achieve security, 1030 scalability, maintainability, interoperability, and improved 1031 cost-efficiency goals; and 1032 (d)âIncludes, at a minimum, best practices, guidelines, and 1033 standards for: 1034 1.âData models and taxonomies. 1035 2.âMaster data management. 1036 3.âData integration and interoperability. 1037 4.âData security and encryption. 1038 5.âBot prevention and data protection. 1039 6.âData backup and recovery. 1040 7.âApplication portfolio and catalog requirements. 1041 8.âApplication architectural patterns and principles. 1042 9.âTechnology and platform standards. 1043 10.âSecure coding practices. 1044 11.âPerformance and scalability. 1045 12.âCloud infrastructure and architecture. 1046 13.âNetworking, connectivity, and security protocols. 1047 14.âAuthentication, authorization, and access controls. 1048 15.âDisaster recovery. 1049 16.âQuality assurance. 1050 17.âTesting methodologies and measurements. 1051 18.âLogging and log retention. 1052 19.âApplication and use of artificial intelligence. 1053 (5)âDIGIT shall develop open data technical standards and 1054 terminologies for use by state agencies. DIGIT shall develop 1055 enterprise technology testing and quality assurance best 1056 practices and standards to ensure the reliability, security, and 1057 performance of information technology systems. Such best 1058 practices and standards must include: 1059 (a)âFunctional testing to ensure software or systems meet 1060 required specifications. 1061 (b)âPerformance and load testing to ensure software and 1062 systems operate efficiently under various conditions. 1063 (c)âSecurity testing to protect software and systems from 1064 vulnerabilities and cyber threats. 1065 (d)âCompatibility and interoperability testing to ensure 1066 software and systems operate seamlessly across environments. 1067 (6)âDIGIT shall produce and provide the following reports 1068 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 1069 the House of Representatives: 1070 (a)âAnnually by December 15, an enterprise analysis report 1071 for state agencies which includes all of the following: 1072 1.âResults of the state agency needs assessments, including 1073 any plan to address technical debt as required by s. 282.0061 1074 pursuant to the schedule adopted. 1075 2.âAlternative standards related to federal funding adopted 1076 pursuant to s. 282.0061. 1077 3.âInformation technology financial data for each state 1078 agency for the previous fiscal year. This portion of the annual 1079 report must include, at a minimum, the following recurring and 1080 nonrecurring information: 1081 a.âTotal number of full-time equivalent positions. 1082 b.âTotal amount of salary. 1083 c.âTotal amount of benefits. 1084 d.âTotal number of comparable full-time equivalent 1085 positions and total amount of expenditures for information 1086 technology staff augmentation. 1087 e.âTotal number of contracts and purchase orders and total 1088 amount of associated expenditures for information technology 1089 managed services. 1090 f.âTotal amount of expenditures by state term contract as 1091 defined in s. 287.012, contracts procured using alternative 1092 purchasing methods as authorized pursuant to s. 287.042(16), and 1093 state agency procurements through request for proposal, 1094 invitation to negotiate, invitation to bid, single source, and 1095 emergency purchases. 1096 g.âTotal amount of expenditures for hardware. 1097 h.âTotal amount of expenditures for non-cloud software. 1098 i.âTotal amount of expenditures for cloud software licenses 1099 and services with a separate amount for expenditures for state 1100 data center services. 1101 j.âTotal amount of expenditures for cloud data center 1102 services with a separate amount for expenditures for state data 1103 center services. 1104 k.âTotal amount of expenditures for administrative costs. 1105 4.âConsolidated information for the previous fiscal year 1106 about state information technology projects, which must include, 1107 at a minimum, the following information: 1108 a.âAnticipated funding requirements for information 1109 technology support over the next 5 years. 1110 b.âAn inventory of current information technology assets 1111 and major projects. As used in this paragraph, the term âmajor 1112 projectâ includes projects costing more than $500,000 to 1113 implement. 1114 c.âSignificant unmet needs for information technology 1115 resources over the next 5 fiscal years, ranked in priority order 1116 according to their urgency. 1117 5.âA review and summary of whether the information 1118 technology contract policy established pursuant to s. 282.0064 1119 is included in all solicitations and contracts. 1120 (b)âBiennially by December 15 of even-numbered years, a 1121 report on the strategic direction of information technology in 1122 the state which includes recommendations for all of the 1123 following: 1124 1.âStandardization and consolidation of information 1125 technology services that are identified as common across state 1126 agencies as required in s. 282.0061. 1127 2.âInformation technology services needed to be designed, 1128 delivered, and managed as state agency enterprise information 1129 technology services. Recommendations must include the 1130 identification of existing information technology resources 1131 associated with the services, if existing services must be 1132 transferred as a result of being delivered and managed as 1133 enterprise information technology services, and which entity is 1134 best suited to manage the service. 1135 (c)1.âWhen conducted as provided in this paragraph, a 1136 market analysis and accompanying strategic plan submitted by 1137 December 31 of each year that the market analysis is conducted. 1138 2.âNo less frequently than every 3 years, DIGIT shall 1139 conduct a market analysis to determine whether the: 1140 a.âInformation technology resources across state agencies 1141 are used in the most cost-effective and cost-efficient manner, 1142 while recognizing that the replacement of certain legacy 1143 information technology systems within the enterprise may be cost 1144 prohibitive or cost inefficient due to the remaining useful life 1145 of those resources; and 1146 b.âState agencies are using best practices with respect to 1147 information technology, information services, and the 1148 acquisition of emerging technologies and information services. 1149 3.âEach market analysis must be used to prepare a strategic 1150 plan for continued and future information technology and 1151 information services, including, but not limited to, proposed 1152 acquisitions of new services or technologies and approaches to 1153 the implementation of any new services or technologies. 1154 (7)(a)âDIGIT shall develop, implement, and maintain a 1155 library to serve as the official repository for all enterprise 1156 information technology policies, standards, guidelines, and best 1157 practices applicable to state agencies. The online library must 1158 be accessible and searchable by all state agencies and the 1159 Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of Financial 1160 Services, and the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 1161 Services through a secure authentication system. The library 1162 must include standardized checklists organized by technical 1163 subject areas to assist state agencies in measuring compliance 1164 with the information technology policies, standards, guidelines, 1165 and best practices. 1166 (b)âDIGIT shall establish procedures to ensure the 1167 integrity, security, and availability of the library, including 1168 appropriate access controls, encryption, and disaster recovery 1169 measures. DIGIT shall regularly update documents and materials 1170 in the library to reflect current state and federal 1171 requirements, industry best practices, and emerging technologies 1172 and shall maintain version control and revision history for all 1173 published documents. DIGIT shall create mechanisms for state 1174 agencies to submit feedback, request clarifications, and 1175 recommend updates. 1176 (8)(a)âEach state agency shall actively participate and 1177 collaborate with DIGIT to achieve the objectives set forth in 1178 this chapter. Each state agency shall also adhere to the 1179 policies, standards, guidelines, and best practices established 1180 by DIGIT in information technology planning, procurement, 1181 implementation, and operations as required by this chapter. 1182 (b)1.âA state agency may request an exemption to a specific 1183 policy, standard, or guideline when compliance is not 1184 technically feasible, would cause undue hardship, or conflicts 1185 with any agency-specific statutory requirement. The state agency 1186 requesting an exemption must submit a formal justification to 1187 DIGIT detailing all of the following: 1188 a.âThe specific requirement for which an exemption is 1189 sought. 1190 b.âThe reason compliance is not feasible or practical. 1191 c.âAny compensating control or alternative measure the 1192 state agency will implement to mitigate associated risks. 1193 d.âThe anticipated duration of the exemption. 1194 2.âDIGIT shall review all exemption requests and provide a 1195 recommendation to the state chief information officer, who shall 1196 present the compliance exemption requests to the chief 1197 information officer workgroup. Approval of exemption requests 1198 must be made by a majority vote of the workgroup. Approved 1199 exemptions must be documented and include conditions and 1200 expiration dates. 1201 3.âA state agency with an approved exemption shall undergo 1202 periodic review to determine whether the exemption remains 1203 necessary or whether compliance can be achieved. 1204 (9)âDIGIT may adopt rules to implement this chapter. 1205 Section 12.âSection 282.0061, Florida Statutes, is created 1206 to read: 1207 282.0061âDIGIT support of state agencies; information 1208 technology procurement and projects.â 1209 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âThe Legislature intends for DIGIT 1210 to support state agencies in their information technology 1211 efforts through the adoption of policies, standards, and 1212 guidance and by providing oversight that recognizes unique state 1213 agency information technology needs, environments, and goals. 1214 DIGIT assistance and support must allow for adaptability to 1215 emerging technologies and organizational needs while maintaining 1216 compliance with industry best practices. DIGIT may not prescribe 1217 specific tools, platforms, or vendors. 1218 (2)âNEEDS ASSESSMENTS.â 1219 (a)âBy January 1, 2029, DIGIT shall conduct full baseline 1220 needs assessments of state agencies to document their respective 1221 technical environments, existing technical debt, security risks, 1222 and compliance with all information technology standards and 1223 guidelines developed and published by DIGIT. The needs 1224 assessment must use the latest version of the Capability 1225 Maturity Model Integration to evaluate each state agencyâs 1226 information technology capabilities, providing a maturity level 1227 rating for each assessed domain. After completion of the initial 1228 full baseline needs assessment, such assessments must be 1229 maintained and updated on a regular schedule adopted by DIGIT. 1230 (b)âIn assessing the existing technical debt portion of the 1231 needs assessment, DIGIT shall analyze the stateâs legacy 1232 information technology systems and develop a plan to document 1233 the needs and costs for replacement systems. The plan must 1234 include an inventory of legacy applications and infrastructure; 1235 the required capabilities not available with the legacy system; 1236 the estimated process, timeline, and cost to migrate from legacy 1237 environments; and any other information necessary for fiscal or 1238 technology planning. The plan must determine and document the 1239 estimated timeframe during which the state agency can continue 1240 to efficiently use legacy information technology systems, 1241 resources, security, and data management to support operations. 1242 State agencies shall provide all necessary documentation to 1243 enable accurate reporting on legacy systems. 1244 (c)âDIGIT shall develop a plan and schedule to conduct the 1245 initial full baseline needs assessments. By October 1, 2027, 1246 DIGIT shall submit the plan to the Governor, the President of 1247 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 1248 (d)âDIGIT shall support state agency strategic planning 1249 efforts and assist state agencies with the production of a 1250 phased roadmap to address known technology gaps and deficiencies 1251 as identified in the needs assessments. The roadmaps must 1252 include specific strategies and initiatives aimed at advancing 1253 the state agencyâs maturity level in accordance with the latest 1254 version of the Capability Maturity Model Integration. State 1255 agencies shall create, maintain, and submit the roadmap on an 1256 annual basis with their legislative budget requests required 1257 under s. 216.023. 1258 (3)âSTANDARDIZATION.âDIGIT shall: 1259 (a)âRecommend in its annual enterprise analysis report for 1260 state agencies required under s. 282.006 any potential method 1261 for standardizing data across state agencies which will promote 1262 interoperability and reduce the collection of duplicative data. 1263 (b)âIdentify any opportunities in such enterprise analysis 1264 report for state agencies for standardization and consolidation 1265 of information technology services that are common across all 1266 state agencies and that support: 1267 1.âImproved interoperability, security, scalability, 1268 maintainability, and cost efficiency; and 1269 2.âBusiness functions and operations, including 1270 administrative functions such as purchasing, accounting and 1271 reporting, cash management, and personnel. 1272 (c)âReview all state agency information technology 1273 legislative budget requests for compliance with the enterprise 1274 architecture, project planning standards, and cybersecurity, and 1275 provide a report of the findings to the Executive Office of the 1276 Governorâs Office of Policy and Budget for consideration for 1277 funding decisions in the Governorâs recommended budget. 1278 (4)âDATA MANAGEMENT.â 1279 (a)âDIGIT shall develop standards for use by state agencies 1280 which support best practices for master data management at the 1281 state agency level to facilitate enterprise data sharing and 1282 interoperability. 1283 (b)âDIGIT shall establish a methodology and strategy for 1284 implementing statewide master data management and submit a 1285 report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 1286 Speaker of the House of Representatives by December 1, 2029. The 1287 report must include the vision, goals, and benefits of 1288 implementing a statewide master data management initiative, an 1289 analysis of the current state of data management, and the 1290 recommended strategy, methodology, and estimated timeline and 1291 resources needed at a state agency and enterprise level to 1292 accomplish the initiative. 1293 (5)âINFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS.âDIGIT has the 1294 following duties and responsibilities related to state agency 1295 technology projects: 1296 (a)âProvide procurement advisory and review services for 1297 information technology projects to all state agencies, including 1298 procurement and contract development assistance to meet the 1299 information technology contract policy established pursuant to 1300 s. 282.0064. 1301 (b)âEstablish best practices and procurement processes, and 1302 develop metrics to support these processes for the procurement 1303 of information technology products and services in order to 1304 reduce costs or improve the provision of government services. 1305 (c)âUpon request, assist state agencies in the development 1306 of information technology-related legislative budget requests. 1307 (d)âDevelop standards and accountability measures for 1308 information technology project planning and implementation, 1309 including criteria for effective project management and 1310 oversight. State agencies shall satisfy these standards and 1311 measures when implementing information technology projects. To 1312 support data-driven decisionmaking, the standards and measures 1313 must include, but are not limited to: 1314 1.âPerformance measurements and metrics that objectively 1315 assess the progress and risks of an information technology 1316 project based on a defined and documented project scope, to 1317 include the number of impacted stakeholders, cost, and schedule, 1318 to determine whether the project is performing as planned and 1319 delivering the intended outcomes. 1320 2.âMethodologies for calculating and defining acceptable 1321 variances between the planned and actual scope of a technology 1322 project which provide clear thresholds for guiding corrective 1323 actions. Such methodologies must account for project complexity 1324 and scale, schedule, performance, quality, and the cost of an 1325 information technology project. 1326 3.âReporting requirements that ensure timely notifications 1327 to all defined stakeholders when an information technology 1328 project exceeds acceptable variances defined and documented in a 1329 project plan, including any variance that results in a schedule 1330 delay of 1 month or more, or a cost increase of $1 million or 1331 more, and that establish procedures for escalating critical 1332 issues to appropriate individuals. 1333 4.âTechnical reporting metrics to determine if an 1334 information technology project complies with the enterprise 1335 architecture standards. 1336 5.âMinimum requirements for engaging stakeholders 1337 throughout a projectâs life cycle. 1338 (e)âDevelop a framework that provides processes, 1339 activities, and deliverables state agencies must comply with 1340 when planning an information technology project. The processes, 1341 activities, and deliverables must include, but are not limited 1342 to, all of the following: 1343 1.âBusiness case development, including the information 1344 required by s. 287.0571(4), full life cycle cost estimates, 1345 governance structure, system interoperability goals, data 1346 management plans, scalability approach, evaluation of 1347 cybersecurity and data privacy risks, and technology-specific 1348 performance metrics and service levels. 1349 2.âMarket research, including the use of a request for 1350 information as defined in s. 287.012. 1351 3.âPlanning and scheduling. 1352 4.âStakeholder engagement. 1353 5.âRisk assessment. 1354 6.âProcurement strategy. 1355 7.âProject governance definition. 1356 8.âSystem design and requirements. 1357 9.âChange management. 1358 10.âMonitoring and reporting. 1359 11.âPostimplementation review and planning. 1360 12.âSolicitation documentation. 1361 (f)âDevelop information technology project reports for use 1362 by state agencies, including, but not limited to, operational 1363 work plans, project spending plans, and project status reports. 1364 Reporting standards must include content, format, and frequency 1365 of project updates. 1366 (g)âDevelop and provide training specific to information 1367 technology project management and oversight which supplements 1368 and enhances the training offered by the department and the 1369 Chief Financial Officer under s. 287.057(15)(b). DIGIT shall 1370 evaluate such training every 2 years to assess its effectiveness 1371 and update the training curriculum. The training must address 1372 the unique requirements and risk profiles of state information 1373 technology projects, procurements, contract management, and 1374 vendor management. 1375 (h)âPerform project oversight on all state agency 1376 information technology projects that have total project costs of 1377 $10 million or more. DIGIT shall report by the 30th day after 1378 the end of each quarter to the Executive Office of the Governor, 1379 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 1380 Representatives on any information technology project that DIGIT 1381 identifies as high-risk due to the project exceeding the 1382 acceptable project variance thresholds provided in the project 1383 management and oversight standards. The report must include a 1384 risk assessment, including fiscal risks associated with 1385 proceeding to the next stage of the project, a list of all 1386 projects with a performance deficiency, reported pursuant to s. 1387 287.057(26)(d)1., which has not been corrected as of the end of 1388 the reporting period, and a recommendation for corrective 1389 actions required, including suspension or termination of the 1390 project. 1391 (i)âEstablish a streamlined reporting process with clear 1392 timelines and escalation procedures for notifying a state agency 1393 of noncompliance with the standards developed and adopted by 1394 DIGIT. 1395 (j)âDevelop and maintain standards, performance metrics, 1396 and evaluation tools to measure the performance of information 1397 technology vendors that provide information technology 1398 commodities or services to the state. The standards, metrics, 1399 and tools must: 1400 1.âBe organized by vendor category, reflecting the 1401 different roles, services, and risk profiles of information 1402 technology vendors, including, but not limited to, software, 1403 cloud services, infrastructure, cybersecurity, systems 1404 integration, and professional services. 1405 2.âInclude objective, measurable criteria to assess vendor 1406 performance, which criteria may include timeliness, quality of 1407 deliverables, cost control, compliance with contract 1408 requirements, security and privacy practices, responsiveness, 1409 and customer satisfaction. 1410 3.âProvide for the collection and analysis of performance 1411 data across state agencies to support consistent and comparable 1412 evaluations. 1413 4.âSupport a scoring mechanism that may be used in 1414 procurement and contract management processes, including the 1415 identification of vendors eligible for inclusion on a preferred 1416 vendors list established by DIGIT. 1417 5.âProvide for the public availability of the preferred 1418 vendors list, including vendor rankings by category, in a manner 1419 determined by DIGIT. 1420 6.âRequire that, to the extent permitted by law, priority 1421 consideration in future procurements be given to vendors on the 1422 preferred vendors list based on performance ranking and cost, as 1423 applicable to the procurement method used. 1424 7.âBe periodically reviewed and updated to reflect evolving 1425 technology, market conditions, and state needs. 1426 (6)âINFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FINANCIAL DATA.â 1427 (a)âIn consultation with state agencies, DIGIT shall create 1428 a methodology, an approach, and applicable templates and formats 1429 for identifying and collecting both current and planned 1430 information technology expenditure data at the state agency 1431 level. DIGIT shall continuously obtain, review, and maintain 1432 records of the appropriations, expenditures, and revenues for 1433 information technology for each state agency. 1434 (b)âDIGIT shall prescribe the format for state agencies to 1435 provide all necessary financial information to DIGIT for 1436 inclusion in the annual report required under s. 282.006. State 1437 agencies shall provide the information to DIGIT by October 1 for 1438 the previous fiscal year. 1439 (7)âFEDERAL CONFLICTS.âDIGIT must work with state agencies 1440 to provide alternative standards, policies, or requirements that 1441 do not conflict with federal regulations or requirements if 1442 adherence to standards or policies adopted by or established 1443 pursuant to this section conflict with federal regulations or 1444 requirements imposed on an entity within the enterprise and 1445 results in, or is expected to result in, adverse action against 1446 any state agency or loss of federal funding. 1447 Section 13.âSection 282.0062, Florida Statutes, is created 1448 to read: 1449 282.0062 DIGIT workgroups.âThe following workgroups are 1450 established within DIGIT to facilitate coordination with state 1451 agencies: 1452 (1)âCHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER WORKGROUP.â 1453 (a)âThe chief information officer workgroup, composed of 1454 all state agency chief information officers, shall consider and 1455 make recommendations to the state chief information officer and 1456 the state chief information architect on such matters as 1457 enterprise information technology policies, standards, services, 1458 and architecture. The workgroup may also identify and recommend 1459 opportunities for the establishment of public-private 1460 partnerships when considering technology infrastructure and 1461 services in order to accelerate project delivery and provide a 1462 source of new or increased project funding. 1463 (b)âAt a minimum, the state chief information officer shall 1464 consult with the workgroup on a quarterly basis with regard to 1465 executing the duties and responsibilities of the state agencies 1466 related to statewide information technology strategic planning 1467 and policy. 1468 (2)âENTERPRISE DATA AND INTEROPERABILITY WORKGROUP.â 1469 (a)âThe enterprise data and interoperability workgroup, 1470 composed of chief data officer representatives from all state 1471 agencies, shall consider and make recommendations to the state 1472 chief data officer on such matters as enterprise data policies, 1473 standards, services, and architecture that promote data 1474 consistency, accessibility, and seamless integration across the 1475 enterprise. 1476 (b)âAt a minimum, the state chief data officer shall 1477 consult with the workgroup on a quarterly basis with regard to 1478 executing the duties and responsibilities of the state agencies 1479 related to statewide data governance planning and policy. 1480 (3)âENTERPRISE SECURITY WORKGROUP.â 1481 (a)âThe enterprise security workgroup, composed of chief 1482 information security officer representatives from all state 1483 agencies, shall consider and make recommendations to the state 1484 chief information security officer on such matters as 1485 cybersecurity policies, standards, services, and architecture 1486 that promote the protection of state assets. 1487 (b)âAt a minimum, the state chief information security 1488 officer shall consult with the workgroup on a quarterly basis 1489 with regard to executing the duties and responsibilities of the 1490 state agencies related to cybersecurity governance and policy 1491 development. 1492 (4)âENTERPRISE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY QUALITY ASSURANCE 1493 WORKGROUP.â 1494 (a)âThe enterprise information technology quality assurance 1495 workgroup, composed of testing and quality assurance 1496 representatives from all state agencies, shall consider and make 1497 recommendations to the state chief technology officer on such 1498 matters as testing methodologies, tools, and best practices to 1499 reduce risks related to software defects, cybersecurity threats, 1500 and operational failures. 1501 (b)âAt a minimum, the state chief information officer shall 1502 consult with the workgroup on a quarterly basis with regard to 1503 executing the duties and responsibilities of the state agencies 1504 related to enterprise software testing and quality assurance 1505 standards. 1506 (5)âENTERPRISE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROJECT MANAGEMENT 1507 WORKGROUP.â 1508 (a)âThe enterprise information technology project 1509 management workgroup, composed of information technology project 1510 manager representatives from all state agencies, shall consider 1511 and make recommendations to the state chief technology officer 1512 on such matters as information technology project management 1513 policies, standards, accountability measures, and services that 1514 promote project governance and standardization across the 1515 enterprise. 1516 (b)âAt a minimum, the state chief information officer shall 1517 consult with the workgroup on a quarterly basis with regard to 1518 executing the duties and responsibilities of the state agencies 1519 related to project management and oversight. 1520 (6)âENTERPRISE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PURCHASING 1521 WORKGROUP.â 1522 (a)âThe enterprise information technology purchasing 1523 workgroup, composed of information technology procurement 1524 representatives from all state agencies, shall consider and make 1525 recommendations to the state chief technology procurement 1526 officer on such matters as information technology procurement 1527 policies, standards, and purchasing strategy and optimization 1528 that promote best practices for contract negotiation, 1529 consolidation, and effective service-level agreement 1530 implementation across the enterprise. 1531 (b)âAt a minimum, the state chief information officer shall 1532 consult with the workgroup on a quarterly basis with regard to 1533 executing the duties and responsibilities of the state agencies 1534 related to technology evaluation, purchasing, and cost savings. 1535 (7)âDEPARTMENT OF LEGAL AFFAIRS, DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL 1536 SERVICES, AND DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND CONSUMER SERVICES 1537 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY STAFF.âAppropriate information technology 1538 staff of the Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 1539 Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 1540 Consumer Services shall participate in the workgroups created 1541 under subsections (1), (2), and (3) and may participate in any 1542 other workgroups as authorized by their respective elected 1543 official. 1544 Section 14.âSection 282.0063, Florida Statutes, is created 1545 to read: 1546 282.0063 State information technology professionals career 1547 paths and training.â 1548 (1)âDIGIT shall develop standardized frameworks for, and 1549 career paths, progressions, and training programs for, the 1550 benefit of state agency information technology personnel. To 1551 meet that goal, DIGIT shall: 1552 (a)âAssess current and future information technology 1553 workforce needs across state agencies, identify skill gaps, and 1554 develop strategies to address them. 1555 (b)âDevelop and establish a training program for state 1556 agencies to support the understanding and implementation of each 1557 element of the enterprise architecture. 1558 (c)âEstablish training programs, certifications, and 1559 continuing education opportunities to enhance information 1560 technology competencies, including cybersecurity, cloud 1561 computing, and emerging technologies. 1562 (d)âSupport initiatives to provide existing employees with 1563 training or other opportunities to develop skills in emerging 1564 technologies and automation, ensuring that state agencies remain 1565 competitive and innovative. 1566 (e)âDevelop strategies to recruit and retain information 1567 technology professionals, including internship programs, 1568 apprenticeships, partnerships with educational institutions, 1569 scholarships for service, and initiatives to attract diverse 1570 talent. 1571 (2)âDIGIT shall consult with CareerSource Florida, Inc., 1572 the Department of Commerce, and the Department of Education in 1573 the implementation of this section. 1574 Section 15.âSection 282.0064, Florida Statutes, is created 1575 to read: 1576 282.0064âInformation technology contract policy.â 1577 (1)âIn coordination with the Department of Management 1578 Services, DIGIT shall establish a policy for all information 1579 technology-related solicitations and contracts, including state 1580 term contracts; contracts sourced using alternative purchasing 1581 methods as authorized pursuant to s. 287.042(16); sole source 1582 and emergency procurements; and contracts for commodities, 1583 consultant services, and staff augmentation services. 1584 (2)âRelated to state term contracts, the information 1585 technology policy must include: 1586 (a)âIdentification of the information technology product 1587 and service categories to be included in state term contracts. 1588 (b)âThe term of each information technology-related state 1589 term contract. 1590 (c)âThe maximum number of vendors authorized on each state 1591 term contract. 1592 (3)âFor all contracts, the information technology policy 1593 must include: 1594 (a)âEvaluation criteria for the award of information 1595 technology-related contracts. 1596 (b)âRequirements to be included in solicitations. 1597 (c)âAt a minimum, a requirement that any contract for 1598 information technology commodities or services meet the 1599 requirements of the enterprise architecture and National 1600 Institute of Standards and Technology Cybersecurity Framework. 1601 (4)âThe policy must include the following requirements for 1602 any information technology project that requires project 1603 oversight through independent verification and validation: 1604 (a)âAn entity providing independent verification and 1605 validation may not have any: 1606 1.âTechnical, managerial, or financial interest in the 1607 project; or 1608 2.âResponsibility for or participation in any other aspect 1609 of the project. 1610 (b)âThe primary objective of independent verification and 1611 validation must be to provide an objective assessment throughout 1612 the entire project life cycle, reporting directly to all 1613 relevant stakeholders. An independent verification and 1614 validation entity shall independently verify and validate 1615 whether: 1616 1.âThe project is being built and implemented in accordance 1617 with defined technical architecture, specifications, and 1618 requirements. 1619 2.âThe project is adhering to established project 1620 management processes. 1621 3.âThe procurement of products, tools, and services and 1622 resulting contracts aligns with current statutory and regulatory 1623 requirements. 1624 4.âThe value of services delivered is commensurate with 1625 project costs. 1626 5.âThe completed project meets the actual needs of the 1627 intended users. 1628 (c)âThe entity performing independent verification and 1629 validation shall provide regular reports and assessments 1630 directly to the designated oversight body, identifying risks, 1631 deficiencies, and recommendations for corrective actions to 1632 ensure project success and compliance with statutory 1633 requirements. 1634 (5)âThe Division of State Purchasing in the Department of 1635 Management Services shall coordinate with DIGIT on state term 1636 contract solicitations and invitations to negotiate related to 1637 information technology. Such coordination must include reviewing 1638 the solicitation specifications to verify compliance with 1639 enterprise architecture and cybersecurity standards, evaluating 1640 vendor responses under established criteria, answering vendor 1641 questions, and providing any other technical expertise 1642 necessary. 1643 (6)âThe Department of Legal Affairs, the Department of 1644 Financial Services, and the Department of Agriculture and 1645 Consumer Services may adopt alternatives to the information 1646 technology policy established by DIGIT pursuant to this section. 1647 If alternatives to the policy are adopted, such department must 1648 notify DIGIT, the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 1649 Speaker of the House of Representatives in writing of the 1650 adoption of the alternatives and provide a justification for 1651 adoption of the alternatives, including whether the alternatives 1652 were necessary to meet alternatives adopted pursuant to s. 1653 282.00515, and explain the manner in which the department will 1654 achieve the information technology policy. 1655 Section 16.âSubsections (3), (4), (7), and (10) of section 1656 282.318, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1657 282.318âCybersecurity.â 1658 (3)âDIGIT The department, acting through the Florida 1659 Digital Service, is the lead entity responsible for establishing 1660 standards and processes for assessing state agency cybersecurity 1661 risks and determining appropriate security measures that comply 1662 with the latest national and state data compliance security 1663 standards. Such standards and processes must be consistent with 1664 generally accepted technology best practices, including the 1665 National Institute for Standards and Technology Cybersecurity 1666 Framework, for cybersecurity. DIGIT The department, acting 1667 through the Florida Digital Service, shall adopt rules that 1668 mitigate risks; safeguard state agency digital assets, data, 1669 information, and information technology resources to ensure 1670 availability, confidentiality, and integrity; and support a 1671 security governance framework. DIGIT The department, acting 1672 through the Florida Digital Service, shall also: 1673 (a)âDesignate an employee of the Florida Digital Service as 1674 the state chief information security officer. The state chief 1675 information security officer must have experience and expertise 1676 in security and risk management for communications and 1677 information technology resources. The state chief information 1678 security officer is responsible for the development of 1679 enterprise cybersecurity policy, standards, operation, and 1680 security architecture oversight of cybersecurity for state 1681 technology systems. The state chief information security officer 1682 must shall be notified of all confirmed or suspected incidents 1683 or threats of state agency information technology resources and 1684 must report such incidents or threats to the state chief 1685 information officer and the Governor. 1686 (b)âDevelop, and annually update by February 1, a statewide 1687 cybersecurity strategic plan that includes security goals and 1688 objectives for cybersecurity, including the identification and 1689 mitigation of risk, proactive protections against threats, 1690 tactical risk detection, threat reporting, and response and 1691 recovery protocols for a cyber incident. 1692 (c)âDevelop and publish for use by state agencies a 1693 cybersecurity governance framework that, at a minimum, includes 1694 guidelines and processes for: 1695 1.âEstablishing asset management procedures to ensure that 1696 an agencyâs information technology resources are identified and 1697 managed consistent with their relative importance to the 1698 agencyâs business objectives. 1699 2.âUsing a standard risk assessment methodology that 1700 includes the identification of an agencyâs priorities, 1701 constraints, risk tolerances, and assumptions necessary to 1702 support operational risk decisions and that is aligned with 1703 generally accepted technology best practices, including the 1704 National Institute for Standards and Technology Cybersecurity 1705 Framework. 1706 3.âCompleting comprehensive risk assessments and 1707 cybersecurity audits, which may be completed by an independent 1708 third party a private sector vendor, and submitting completed 1709 assessments and audits to DIGIT the department. 1710 4.âIdentifying protection procedures to manage the 1711 protection of an agencyâs information, data, and information 1712 technology resources. 1713 5.âEstablishing procedures for accessing information and 1714 data to ensure the confidentiality, integrity, and availability 1715 of such information and data. 1716 6.âDetecting threats through proactive monitoring of 1717 events, continuous security monitoring, and defined detection 1718 processes. 1719 7.âEstablishing agency cybersecurity incident response 1720 teams and describing their responsibilities for responding to 1721 cybersecurity incidents, including breaches of personal 1722 information containing confidential or exempt data. 1723 8.âRecovering information and data in response to a 1724 cybersecurity incident. The recovery may include recommended 1725 improvements to the agency processes, policies, or guidelines. 1726 9.âEstablishing a cybersecurity incident reporting process 1727 that includes procedures for notifying DIGIT the department and 1728 the Department of Law Enforcement of cybersecurity incidents. 1729 a.âThe level of severity of the cybersecurity incident is 1730 defined by the National Cyber Incident Response Plan of the 1731 United States Department of Homeland Security as follows: 1732 (I)âLevel 5 is an emergency-level incident within the 1733 specified jurisdiction that poses an imminent threat to the 1734 provision of wide-scale critical infrastructure services; 1735 national, state, or local government security; or the lives of 1736 the countryâs, stateâs, or local governmentâs residents. 1737 (II)âLevel 4 is a severe-level incident that is likely to 1738 result in a significant impact in the affected jurisdiction to 1739 public health or safety; national, state, or local security; 1740 economic security; or civil liberties. 1741 (III)âLevel 3 is a high-level incident that is likely to 1742 result in a demonstrable impact in the affected jurisdiction to 1743 public health or safety; national, state, or local security; 1744 economic security; civil liberties; or public confidence. 1745 (IV)âLevel 2 is a medium-level incident that may impact 1746 public health or safety; national, state, or local security; 1747 economic security; civil liberties; or public confidence. 1748 (V)âLevel 1 is a low-level incident that is unlikely to 1749 impact public health or safety; national, state, or local 1750 security; economic security; civil liberties; or public 1751 confidence. 1752 b.âThe cybersecurity incident reporting process must 1753 specify the information that must be reported by a state agency 1754 following a cybersecurity incident or ransomware incident, 1755 which, at a minimum, must include the following: 1756 (I)âA summary of the facts surrounding the cybersecurity 1757 incident or ransomware incident. 1758 (II)âThe date on which the state agency most recently 1759 backed up its data; the physical location of the backup, if the 1760 backup was affected; and if the backup was created using cloud 1761 computing. 1762 (III)âThe types of data compromised by the cybersecurity 1763 incident or ransomware incident. 1764 (IV)âThe estimated fiscal impact of the cybersecurity 1765 incident or ransomware incident. 1766 (V)âIn the case of a ransomware incident, the details of 1767 the ransom demanded. 1768 c.(I)âA state agency shall report all ransomware incidents 1769 and any cybersecurity incident determined by the state agency to 1770 be of severity level 3, 4, or 5 to the state chief information 1771 security officer Cybersecurity Operations Center and the 1772 Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law Enforcement as soon 1773 as possible but no later than 48 hours after discovery of the 1774 cybersecurity incident and no later than 12 hours after 1775 discovery of the ransomware incident. The report must contain 1776 the information required in sub-subparagraph b. If the event 1777 involves services housed or procured through the Northwest 1778 Regional Data Center, the state agency must also notify the 1779 Northwest Regional Data Center. 1780 (II)â The state chief information security officer 1781 Cybersecurity Operations Center shall notify the President of 1782 the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives of 1783 any severity level 3, 4, or 5 incident as soon as possible but 1784 no later than 12 hours after receiving a state agencyâs incident 1785 report. The notification must include a high-level description 1786 of the incident and the likely effects. 1787 d.âA state agency shall report a cybersecurity incident 1788 determined by the state agency to be of severity level 1 or 2 to 1789 the state chief information security officer Cybersecurity 1790 Operations Center and the Cybercrime Office of the Department of 1791 Law Enforcement as soon as possible, but no later than 96 hours 1792 after the discovery of the cybersecurity incident and no later 1793 than 72 hours after the discovery of the ransomware incident. 1794 The report must contain the information required in sub 1795 subparagraph b. If the event involves services housed or 1796 procured through the Northwest Regional Data Center, the state 1797 agency must also notify the Northwest Regional Data Center. 1798 e.âThe state chief information security officer 1799 Cybersecurity Operations Center shall provide a consolidated 1800 incident report on a quarterly basis to the President of the 1801 Senate and, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the 1802 Florida Cybersecurity Advisory Council. The report provided to 1803 the Florida Cybersecurity Advisory Council may not contain the 1804 name of any agency, network information, or system identifying 1805 information but must contain sufficient relevant information to 1806 allow the Florida Cybersecurity Advisory Council to fulfill its 1807 responsibilities as required in s. 282.319(9). 1808 10.âIncorporating information obtained through detection 1809 and response activities into the agencyâs cybersecurity incident 1810 response plans. 1811 11.âDeveloping agency strategic and operational 1812 cybersecurity plans required pursuant to this section. 1813 12.âEstablishing the managerial, operational, and technical 1814 safeguards for protecting state government data and information 1815 technology resources that align with the state agency risk 1816 management strategy and that protect the confidentiality, 1817 integrity, and availability of information and data. 1818 13.âEstablishing procedures for procuring information 1819 technology commodities and services that require the commodity 1820 or service to meet the National Institute of Standards and 1821 Technology Cybersecurity Framework. 1822 14.âSubmitting after-action reports following a 1823 cybersecurity incident or ransomware incident. Such guidelines 1824 and processes for submitting after-action reports must be 1825 developed and published by December 1, 2022. 1826 (d)âAssist state agencies in complying with this section. 1827 (e)âIn collaboration with the Cybercrime Office of the 1828 Department of Law Enforcement, annually provide training for 1829 state agency information security managers and computer security 1830 incident response team members that contains training on 1831 cybersecurity, including cybersecurity threats, trends, and best 1832 practices. 1833 (f)âAnnually review the strategic and operational 1834 cybersecurity plans of state agencies. 1835 (g)âAnnually provide cybersecurity training to all state 1836 agency technology professionals and employees with access to 1837 highly sensitive information which develops, assesses, and 1838 documents competencies by role and skill level. The 1839 cybersecurity training curriculum must include training on the 1840 identification of each cybersecurity incident severity level 1841 referenced in sub-subparagraph (c)9.a. The training may be 1842 provided in collaboration with the Cybercrime Office of the 1843 Department of Law Enforcement, a private sector entity, or an 1844 institution of the State University System. 1845 (h)âOperate and maintain a Cybersecurity Operations Center 1846 led by the state chief information security officer, which must 1847 be primarily virtual and staffed with tactical detection and 1848 incident response personnel. The Cybersecurity Operations Center 1849 shall serve as a clearinghouse for threat information and 1850 coordinate with the Department of Law Enforcement to support 1851 state agencies and their response to any confirmed or suspected 1852 cybersecurity incident. 1853 (i)âLead an Emergency Support Function, ESF CYBER, under 1854 the state comprehensive emergency management plan as described 1855 in s. 252.35. 1856 (4)âEach state agency head shall, at a minimum: 1857 (a)âDesignate an information security manager to administer 1858 the cybersecurity program of the state agency. This designation 1859 must be provided annually in writing to DIGIT the department by 1860 January 1. A state agencyâs information security manager, for 1861 purposes of these information security duties, shall report 1862 directly to the agency head. 1863 (b)âIn consultation with the state chief information 1864 security officer department, through the Florida Digital 1865 Service, and the Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law 1866 Enforcement, establish an agency cybersecurity response team to 1867 respond to a cybersecurity incident. The agency cybersecurity 1868 response team shall convene upon notification of a cybersecurity 1869 incident and shall must immediately report all confirmed or 1870 suspected incidents to the state chief information security 1871 officer, or his or her designee, and comply with all applicable 1872 guidelines and processes established pursuant to paragraph 1873 (3)(c). 1874 (c)âSubmit to the state chief information security officer 1875 department annually by July 31, the state agencyâs strategic and 1876 operational cybersecurity plans developed pursuant to rules and 1877 guidelines established by the state chief information security 1878 officer department, through the Florida Digital Service. 1879 1.âThe state agency strategic cybersecurity plan must cover 1880 a 2-year 3-year period and, at a minimum, define security goals, 1881 intermediate objectives, and projected agency costs for the 1882 strategic issues of agency information security policy, risk 1883 management, security training, security incident response, and 1884 disaster recovery. The plan must be based on the statewide 1885 cybersecurity strategic plan created by the state chief 1886 information security officer department and include performance 1887 metrics that can be objectively measured to reflect the status 1888 of the state agencyâs progress in meeting security goals and 1889 objectives identified in the agencyâs strategic information 1890 security plan. 1891 2.âThe state agency operational cybersecurity plan must 1892 include a set of measures that objectively assess the 1893 performance of the agencyâs cybersecurity program in accordance 1894 with its risk management plan progress report that objectively 1895 measures progress made towards the prior operational 1896 cybersecurity plan and a project plan that includes activities, 1897 timelines, and deliverables for security objectives that the 1898 state agency will implement during the current fiscal year. 1899 (d)âConduct, and update every 2 3 years, a comprehensive 1900 risk assessment, which may be completed by an independent third 1901 party a private sector vendor, to determine the security threats 1902 to the data, information, and information technology resources, 1903 including mobile devices and print environments, of the agency. 1904 The risk assessment must comply with the risk assessment 1905 methodology developed by the state chief information security 1906 officer department and is confidential and exempt from s. 1907 119.07(1), except that such information shall be available to 1908 the Auditor General, the state chief information security 1909 officer Florida Digital Service within the department, the 1910 Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law Enforcement, and, for 1911 state agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief 1912 Inspector General. If an independent third party a private 1913 sector vendor is used to complete a comprehensive risk 1914 assessment, it must attest to the validity of the risk 1915 assessment findings. The comprehensive risk assessment must 1916 include all of the following: 1917 1.âThe results of vulnerability and penetration tests on 1918 any Internet website or mobile application that processes any 1919 sensitive personal information or confidential information, and 1920 a plan to address any vulnerability identified in the tests. 1921 2.âA written acknowledgment that the executive director or 1922 the secretary of the agency, the chief financial officer of the 1923 agency, and each executive manager as designated by the state 1924 agency, have been made aware of the risks revealed during the 1925 preparation of the agencyâs operations cybersecurity plan and 1926 the comprehensive risk assessment. 1927 (e)âDevelop, and periodically update, written internal 1928 policies and procedures, which include procedures for reporting 1929 cybersecurity incidents and breaches to the Cybercrime Office of 1930 the Department of Law Enforcement and the state chief 1931 information security officer Florida Digital Service within the 1932 department. Such policies and procedures must be consistent with 1933 the rules, guidelines, and processes established by DIGIT the 1934 department to ensure the security of the data, information, and 1935 information technology resources of the agency. The internal 1936 policies and procedures that, if disclosed, could facilitate the 1937 unauthorized modification, disclosure, or destruction of data or 1938 information technology resources are confidential information 1939 and exempt from s. 119.07(1), except that such information must 1940 shall be available to the Auditor General, the Cybercrime Office 1941 of the Department of Law Enforcement, the state chief 1942 information security officer the Florida Digital Service within 1943 the department, and, for state agencies under the jurisdiction 1944 of the Governor, the Chief Inspector General. 1945 (f)âImplement managerial, operational, and technical 1946 safeguards and risk assessment remediation plans recommended by 1947 DIGIT the department to address identified risks to the data, 1948 information, and information technology resources of the agency. 1949 The state chief information security officer department, through 1950 the Florida Digital Service, shall track implementation by state 1951 agencies upon development of such remediation plans in 1952 coordination with agency inspectors general. 1953 (g)âEnsure that periodic internal audits and evaluations of 1954 the agencyâs cybersecurity program for the data, information, 1955 and information technology resources of the agency are 1956 conducted. The results of such audits and evaluations are 1957 confidential information and exempt from s. 119.07(1), except 1958 that such information must shall be available to the Auditor 1959 General, the Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law 1960 Enforcement, the state chief information security officer 1961 Florida Digital Service within the department, and, for agencies 1962 under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief Inspector 1963 General. 1964 (h)âEnsure that the cybersecurity requirements in the 1965 written specifications for the solicitation, contracts, and 1966 service-level agreement of information technology and 1967 information technology resources and services meet or exceed the 1968 applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and standards 1969 for cybersecurity, including the National Institute of Standards 1970 and Technology Cybersecurity Framework. Service-level agreements 1971 must identify service provider and state agency responsibilities 1972 for privacy and security, protection of government data, 1973 personnel background screening, and security deliverables with 1974 associated frequencies. 1975 (i)âProvide cybersecurity awareness training to all state 1976 agency employees within 30 days after commencing employment, and 1977 annually thereafter, concerning cybersecurity risks and the 1978 responsibility of employees to comply with policies, standards, 1979 guidelines, and operating procedures adopted by the state agency 1980 to reduce those risks. The training may be provided in 1981 collaboration with the Cybercrime Office of the Department of 1982 Law Enforcement, a private sector entity, or an institution of 1983 the State University System. 1984 (j)â Develop a process for detecting, reporting, and 1985 responding to threats, breaches, or cybersecurity incidents 1986 which is consistent with the security rules, guidelines, and 1987 processes established by DIGIT the department through the state 1988 chief information security officer Florida Digital Service. 1989 1.âAll cybersecurity incidents and ransomware incidents 1990 must be reported by state agencies. Such reports must comply 1991 with the notification procedures and reporting timeframes 1992 established pursuant to paragraph (3)(c). 1993 2.âFor cybersecurity breaches, state agencies shall provide 1994 notice in accordance with s. 501.171. 1995 (k)âSubmit to the state chief information security officer 1996 Florida Digital Service, within 1 week after the remediation of 1997 a cybersecurity incident or ransomware incident, an after-action 1998 report that summarizes the incident, the incidentâs resolution, 1999 and any insights gained as a result of the incident. 2000 (7)âThe portions of records made confidential and exempt in 2001 subsections (5) and (6) must shall be available to the Auditor 2002 General, the Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law 2003 Enforcement, the state chief information security officer, the 2004 Legislature Florida Digital Service within the department, and, 2005 for agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor, the Chief 2006 Inspector General. Such portions of records may be made 2007 available to a local government, another state agency, or a 2008 federal agency for cybersecurity purposes or in furtherance of 2009 the state agencyâs official duties. 2010 (10)âDIGIT The department shall adopt rules relating to 2011 cybersecurity and to administer this section. 2012 Section 17.âSubsections (3) through (6) of section 2013 282.3185, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2014 282.3185âLocal government cybersecurity.â 2015 (3)âCYBERSECURITY TRAINING.â 2016 (a)âThe state chief information security officer Florida 2017 Digital Service shall: 2018 1.âDevelop a basic cybersecurity training curriculum for 2019 local government employees. All local government employees with 2020 access to the local governmentâs network must complete the basic 2021 cybersecurity training within 30 days after commencing 2022 employment and annually thereafter. 2023 2.âDevelop an advanced cybersecurity training curriculum 2024 for local governments which is consistent with the cybersecurity 2025 training required under s. 282.318(3)(g). All local government 2026 technology professionals and employees with access to highly 2027 sensitive information must complete the advanced cybersecurity 2028 training within 30 days after commencing employment and annually 2029 thereafter. 2030 (b)âThe state chief information security officer Florida 2031 Digital Service may provide the cybersecurity training required 2032 by this subsection in collaboration with the Cybercrime Office 2033 of the Department of Law Enforcement, a private sector entity, 2034 or an institution of the State University System. 2035 (4)âCYBERSECURITY STANDARDS.â 2036 (a)âEach local government shall adopt cybersecurity 2037 standards that safeguard its data, information technology, and 2038 information technology resources to ensure availability, 2039 confidentiality, and integrity. The cybersecurity standards must 2040 be consistent with generally accepted best practices for 2041 cybersecurity, including the National Institute of Standards and 2042 Technology Cybersecurity Framework. 2043 (b)âEach county with a population of 75,000 or more must 2044 adopt the cybersecurity standards required by this subsection by 2045 January 1, 2024. Each county with a population of less than 2046 75,000 must adopt the cybersecurity standards required by this 2047 subsection by January 1, 2025. 2048 (c)âEach municipality with a population of 25,000 or more 2049 must adopt the cybersecurity standards required by this 2050 subsection by January 1, 2024. Each municipality with a 2051 population of less than 25,000 must adopt the cybersecurity 2052 standards required by this subsection by January 1, 2025. 2053 (d)âEach local government shall notify the state chief 2054 information security officer Florida Digital Service of its 2055 compliance with this subsection as soon as possible. 2056 (5)âINCIDENT NOTIFICATION.â 2057 (a)âA local government shall provide notification of a 2058 cybersecurity incident or ransomware incident to the state chief 2059 information security officer Cybersecurity Operations Center, 2060 the Cybercrime Office of the Department of Law Enforcement, and 2061 the sheriff who has jurisdiction over the local government in 2062 accordance with paragraph (b). The notification must include, at 2063 a minimum, the following information: 2064 1.âA summary of the facts surrounding the cybersecurity 2065 incident or ransomware incident. 2066 2.âThe date on which the local government most recently 2067 backed up its data; the physical location of the backup, if the 2068 backup was affected; and if the backup was created using cloud 2069 computing. 2070 3.âThe types of data compromised by the cybersecurity 2071 incident or ransomware incident. 2072 4.âThe estimated fiscal impact of the cybersecurity 2073 incident or ransomware incident. 2074 5.âIn the case of a ransomware incident, the details of the 2075 ransom demanded. 2076 6.âA statement requesting or declining assistance from the 2077 Cybersecurity Operations Center, the Cybercrime Office of the 2078 Department of Law Enforcement, or the sheriff who has 2079 jurisdiction over the local government. 2080 (b)1.âA local government shall report all ransomware 2081 incidents and any cybersecurity incident determined by the local 2082 government to be of severity level 3, 4, or 5 as provided in s. 2083 282.318(3)(c) to the state chief information security officer 2084 Cybersecurity Operations Center, the Cybercrime Office of the 2085 Department of Law Enforcement, and the sheriff who has 2086 jurisdiction over the local government as soon as possible but 2087 no later than 12 48 hours after discovery of the cybersecurity 2088 incident and no later than 6 12 hours after discovery of the 2089 ransomware incident. The report must contain the information 2090 required in paragraph (a). 2091 2.âThe state chief information security officer 2092 Cybersecurity Operations Center shall notify the President of 2093 the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives of 2094 any severity level 3, 4, or 5 incident as soon as possible but 2095 no later than 12 hours after receiving a local governmentâs 2096 incident report. The notification must include a high-level 2097 description of the incident and the likely effects. 2098 (c)âA local government may report a cybersecurity incident 2099 determined by the local government to be of severity level 1 or 2100 2 as provided in s. 282.318(3)(c) to the state chief information 2101 security officer Cybersecurity Operations Center, the Cybercrime 2102 Office of the Department of Law Enforcement, and the sheriff who 2103 has jurisdiction over the local government. The report must 2104 shall contain the information required in paragraph (a). 2105 (d)âThe state chief information security officer 2106 Cybersecurity Operations Center shall provide a consolidated 2107 incident report by the 30th day after the end of each quarter on 2108 a quarterly basis to the President of the Senate and, the 2109 Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Florida 2110 Cybersecurity Advisory Council. The report provided to the 2111 Florida Cybersecurity Advisory Council may not contain the name 2112 of any local government, network information, or system 2113 identifying information but must contain sufficient relevant 2114 information to allow the Florida Cybersecurity Advisory Council 2115 to fulfill its responsibilities as required in s. 282.319(9). 2116 (6)âAFTER-ACTION REPORT.âA local government shall must 2117 submit to the state chief information security officer Florida 2118 Digital Service, within 1 week after the remediation of a 2119 cybersecurity incident or ransomware incident, an after-action 2120 report that summarizes the incident, the incidentâs resolution, 2121 and any insights gained as a result of the incident. By December 2122 1, 2022, the Florida Digital Service shall establish guidelines 2123 and processes for submitting an after-action report. 2124 Section 18.âSection 282.319, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 2125 Section 19.âSection 282.201, Florida Statutes, is amended 2126 to read: 2127 282.201âState data center.âThe state data center is 2128 established within the Northwest Regional Data Center pursuant 2129 to s. 282.2011 and shall meet or exceed the information 2130 technology standards specified in ss. 282.006 and 282.318 the 2131 department. The provision of data center services must comply 2132 with applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and 2133 policies, including all applicable security, privacy, and 2134 auditing requirements. The department shall appoint a director 2135 of the state data center who has experience in leading data 2136 center facilities and has expertise in cloud-computing 2137 management. 2138 (1)âSTATE DATA CENTER DUTIES.âThe state data center shall: 2139 (a)âOffer, develop, and support the services and 2140 applications defined in service-level agreements executed with 2141 its customer entities. 2142 (b)âMaintain performance of the state data center by 2143 ensuring proper data backup; data backup recovery; disaster 2144 recovery; and appropriate security, power, cooling, fire 2145 suppression, and capacity. 2146 (c)âDevelop and implement business continuity and disaster 2147 recovery plans, and annually conduct a live exercise of each 2148 plan. 2149 (d)âEnter into a service-level agreement with each customer 2150 entity to provide the required type and level of service or 2151 services. If a customer entity fails to execute an agreement 2152 within 60 days after commencement of a service, the state data 2153 center may cease service. A service-level agreement may not have 2154 a term exceeding 3 years and at a minimum must: 2155 1.âIdentify the parties and their roles, duties, and 2156 responsibilities under the agreement. 2157 2.âState the duration of the contract term and specify the 2158 conditions for renewal. 2159 3.âIdentify the scope of work. 2160 4.âIdentify the products or services to be delivered with 2161 sufficient specificity to permit an external financial or 2162 performance audit. 2163 5.âEstablish the services to be provided, the business 2164 standards that must be met for each service, the cost of each 2165 service by agency application, and the metrics and processes by 2166 which the business standards for each service are to be 2167 objectively measured and reported. 2168 6.âProvide a timely billing methodology to recover the 2169 costs of services provided to the customer entity pursuant to s. 2170 215.422. 2171 7.âProvide a procedure for modifying the service-level 2172 agreement based on changes in the type, level, and cost of a 2173 service. 2174 8.âInclude a right-to-audit clause to ensure that the 2175 parties to the agreement have access to records for audit 2176 purposes during the term of the service-level agreement. 2177 9.âProvide that a service-level agreement may be terminated 2178 by either party for cause only after giving the other party and 2179 the department notice in writing of the cause for termination 2180 and an opportunity for the other party to resolve the identified 2181 cause within a reasonable period. 2182 10.âProvide for mediation of disputes by the Division of 2183 Administrative Hearings pursuant to s. 120.573. 2184 (e)âFor purposes of chapter 273, be the custodian of 2185 resources and equipment located in and operated, supported, and 2186 managed by the state data center. 2187 (f)âAssume administrative access rights to resources and 2188 equipment, including servers, network components, and other 2189 devices, consolidated into the state data center. 2190 1.âUpon consolidation, a state agency shall relinquish 2191 administrative rights to consolidated resources and equipment. 2192 State agencies required to comply with federal and state 2193 criminal justice information security rules and policies shall 2194 retain administrative access rights sufficient to comply with 2195 the management control provisions of those rules and policies; 2196 however, the state data center shall have the appropriate type 2197 or level of rights to allow the center to comply with its duties 2198 pursuant to this section. The Department of Law Enforcement 2199 shall serve as the arbiter of disputes pertaining to the 2200 appropriate type and level of administrative access rights 2201 pertaining to the provision of management control in accordance 2202 with the federal criminal justice information guidelines. 2203 2.âThe state data center shall provide customer entities 2204 with access to applications, servers, network components, and 2205 other devices necessary for entities to perform business 2206 activities and functions, and as defined and documented in a 2207 service-level agreement. 2208 (g)âIn its procurement process, show preference for cloud 2209 computing solutions that minimize or do not require the 2210 purchasing, financing, or leasing of state data center 2211 infrastructure, and that meet the needs of customer agencies, 2212 that reduce costs, and that meet or exceed the applicable state 2213 and federal laws, regulations, and standards for cybersecurity. 2214 (h)âAssist customer entities in transitioning from state 2215 data center services to the Northwest Regional Data Center or 2216 other third-party cloud-computing services procured by a 2217 customer entity or by the Northwest Regional Data Center on 2218 behalf of a customer entity. 2219 (1)(2)âUSE OF THE STATE DATA CENTER.â 2220 (a)âThe following are exempt from the use of the state data 2221 center: the Department of Law Enforcement, the Department of the 2222 Lotteryâs Gaming System, Systems Design and Development in the 2223 Office of Policy and Budget, the regional traffic management 2224 centers as described in s. 335.14(2) and the Office of Toll 2225 Operations of the Department of Transportation, the State Board 2226 of Administration, state attorneys, public defenders, criminal 2227 conflict and civil regional counsel, capital collateral regional 2228 counsel, and the Florida Housing Finance Corporation, and the 2229 Division of Emergency Management within the Executive Office of 2230 the Governor. 2231 (b)âThe Division of Emergency Management is exempt from the 2232 use of the state data center. This paragraph expires July 1, 2233 2026. 2234 (2)(3)âAGENCY LIMITATIONS.âUnless exempt from the use of 2235 the state data center pursuant to this section or authorized by 2236 the Legislature, a state agency may not: 2237 (a)âCreate a new agency computing facility or data center, 2238 or expand the capability to support additional computer 2239 equipment in an existing agency computing facility or data 2240 center; or 2241 (b)âTerminate services with the state data center without 2242 giving written notice of intent to terminate services 180 days 2243 before such termination. 2244 (4)âDEPARTMENT RESPONSIBILITIES.âThe department shall 2245 provide operational management and oversight of the state data 2246 center, which includes: 2247 (a)âImplementing industry standards and best practices for 2248 the state data centerâs facilities, operations, maintenance, 2249 planning, and management processes. 2250 (b)âDeveloping and implementing cost-recovery mechanisms 2251 that recover the full direct and indirect cost of services 2252 through charges to applicable customer entities. Such cost 2253 recovery mechanisms must comply with applicable state and 2254 federal regulations concerning distribution and use of funds and 2255 must ensure that, for any fiscal year, no service or customer 2256 entity subsidizes another service or customer entity. The 2257 department may recommend other payment mechanisms to the 2258 Executive Office of the Governor, the President of the Senate, 2259 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Such mechanisms 2260 may be implemented only if specifically authorized by the 2261 Legislature. 2262 (c)âDeveloping and implementing appropriate operating 2263 guidelines and procedures necessary for the state data center to 2264 perform its duties pursuant to subsection (1). The guidelines 2265 and procedures must comply with applicable state and federal 2266 laws, regulations, and policies and conform to generally 2267 accepted governmental accounting and auditing standards. The 2268 guidelines and procedures must include, but need not be limited 2269 to: 2270 1.âImplementing a consolidated administrative support 2271 structure responsible for providing financial management, 2272 procurement, transactions involving real or personal property, 2273 human resources, and operational support. 2274 2.âImplementing an annual reconciliation process to ensure 2275 that each customer entity is paying for the full direct and 2276 indirect cost of each service as determined by the customer 2277 entityâs use of each service. 2278 3.âProviding rebates that may be credited against future 2279 billings to customer entities when revenues exceed costs. 2280 4.âRequiring customer entities to validate that sufficient 2281 funds exist before implementation of a customer entityâs request 2282 for a change in the type or level of service provided, if such 2283 change results in a net increase to the customer entityâs cost 2284 for that fiscal year. 2285 5.âBy November 15 of each year, providing to the Office of 2286 Policy and Budget in the Executive Office of the Governor and to 2287 the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees the 2288 projected costs of providing data center services for the 2289 following fiscal year. 2290 6.âProviding a plan for consideration by the Legislative 2291 Budget Commission if the cost of a service is increased for a 2292 reason other than a customer entityâs request made pursuant to 2293 subparagraph 4. Such a plan is required only if the service cost 2294 increase results in a net increase to a customer entity for that 2295 fiscal year. 2296 7.âStandardizing and consolidating procurement and 2297 contracting practices. 2298 (d)âIn collaboration with the Department of Law Enforcement 2299 and the Florida Digital Service, developing and implementing a 2300 process for detecting, reporting, and responding to 2301 cybersecurity incidents, breaches, and threats. 2302 (e)âAdopting rules relating to the operation of the state 2303 data center, including, but not limited to, budgeting and 2304 accounting procedures, cost-recovery methodologies, and 2305 operating procedures. 2306 (5)âNORTHWEST REGIONAL DATA CENTER CONTRACT.âIn order for 2307 the department to carry out its duties and responsibilities 2308 relating to the state data center, the secretary of the 2309 department shall contract by July 1, 2022, with the Northwest 2310 Regional Data Center pursuant to s. 287.057(11). The contract 2311 shall provide that the Northwest Regional Data Center will 2312 manage the operations of the state data center and provide data 2313 center services to state agencies. 2314 (a)âThe department shall provide contract oversight, 2315 including, but not limited to, reviewing invoices provided by 2316 the Northwest Regional Data Center for services provided to 2317 state agency customers. 2318 (b)âThe department shall approve or request updates to 2319 invoices within 10 business days after receipt. If the 2320 department does not respond to the Northwest Regional Data 2321 Center, the invoice will be approved by default. The Northwest 2322 Regional Data Center must submit approved invoices directly to 2323 state agency customers. 2324 Section 20.âSection 282.2011, Florida Statutes, is created 2325 to read: 2326 282.2011âNorthwest Regional Data Center.â 2327 (1)âFor the purpose of providing data center services to 2328 its state agency customers, the Northwest Regional Data Center 2329 is designated as the state data center for all state agencies, 2330 except as otherwise provided by law, and shall: 2331 (a)âOperate under a governance structure that represents 2332 its customers proportionally. 2333 (b)âMaintain an appropriate cost-allocation methodology 2334 that accurately bills state agency customers based solely on the 2335 actual direct and indirect costs of the services provided to 2336 state agency customers and ensures that, for any fiscal year, 2337 state agency customers are not subsidizing other customers of 2338 the data center. Such cost-allocation methodology must comply 2339 with applicable state and federal regulations concerning the 2340 distribution and use of state and federal funds. 2341 (c)âEnter into a service-level agreement with each state 2342 agency customer to provide services as defined and approved by 2343 the governing board of the center. At a minimum, such service 2344 level agreements must: 2345 1.âIdentify the parties and their roles, duties, and 2346 responsibilities under the agreement; 2347 2.âState the duration of the agreement term, which may not 2348 exceed 3 years, and specify the conditions for up to two 2349 optional 1-year renewals of the agreement before execution of a 2350 new agreement; 2351 3.âIdentify the scope of work; 2352 4.âEstablish the services to be provided, the business 2353 standards that must be met for each service, the cost of each 2354 service, and the process by which the business standards for 2355 each service are to be objectively measured and reported; 2356 5.âProvide a timely billing methodology for recovering the 2357 cost of services provided pursuant to s. 215.422; 2358 6.âProvide a procedure for modifying the service-level 2359 agreement to address any changes in projected costs of service; 2360 7.âInclude a right-to-audit clause to ensure that the 2361 parties to the agreement have access to records for audit 2362 purposes during the term of the service-level agreement; 2363 8.âIdentify the products or services to be delivered with 2364 sufficient specificity to permit an external financial or 2365 performance audit; 2366 9.âProvide that the service-level agreement may be 2367 terminated by either party for cause only after giving the other 2368 party notice in writing of the cause for termination and an 2369 opportunity for the other party to resolve the identified cause 2370 within a reasonable period; and 2371 10.âProvide state agency customer entities with access to 2372 applications, servers, network components, and other devices 2373 necessary for entities to perform business activities and 2374 functions and as defined and documented in a service-level 2375 agreement. 2376 (d)âFor purposes of chapter 273, be the custodian of 2377 resources and equipment located in and operated, supported, and 2378 managed by the state data center. 2379 (e)âAssume administrative access rights to resources and 2380 equipment, including servers, network components, and other 2381 devices, consolidated into the state data center. 2382 1.âUpon consolidation, a state agency shall relinquish 2383 administrative rights to consolidated resources and equipment. 2384 State agencies required to comply with federal and state 2385 criminal justice information security rules and policies shall 2386 retain administrative access rights sufficient to comply with 2387 the management control provisions of those rules and policies; 2388 however, the state data center shall have the appropriate type 2389 or level of rights to allow the center to comply with its duties 2390 pursuant to this section. The Department of Law Enforcement 2391 shall serve as the arbiter of disputes pertaining to the 2392 appropriate type and level of administrative access rights 2393 pertaining to the provision of management control in accordance 2394 with the federal criminal justice information guidelines. 2395 2.âThe state data center shall provide customer entities 2396 with access to applications, servers, network components, and 2397 other devices necessary for entities to perform business 2398 activities and functions, and as defined and documented in a 2399 service-level agreement. 2400 (f)âIn its procurement process, show preference for cloud 2401 computing solutions that minimize or do not require the 2402 purchasing or financing of state data center infrastructure, 2403 that meet the needs of state agency customer entities, that 2404 reduce costs, and that meet or exceed the applicable state and 2405 federal laws, regulations, and standards for cybersecurity. 2406 (g)âAssist state agency customer entities in transitioning 2407 from state data center services to other third-party cloud 2408 computing services procured by a customer entity or by the 2409 Northwest Regional Data Center on behalf of the customer entity. 2410 (h)âProvide to the Board of Governors the total annual 2411 budget by major expenditure category, including, but not limited 2412 to, salaries, expenses, operating capital outlay, contracted 2413 services, or other personnel services, by July 30 each fiscal 2414 year. 2415 (i)âProvide to each state agency customer its projected 2416 annual cost for providing the agreed-upon data center services 2417 by September 1 each fiscal year. 2418 (j)âBy November 15 of each year, provide to the Office of 2419 Policy and Budget in the Executive Office of the Governor and to 2420 the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees the 2421 projected costs of providing data center services for the 2422 following fiscal year for each state agency customer. The 2423 projections must include prior-year comparisons, identification 2424 of new services, and documentation of changes to billing 2425 methodologies or service cost allocation. 2426 (k)âProvide a plan for consideration by the Legislative 2427 Budget Commission if the governing body of the center approves 2428 the use of a billing rate schedule after the start of the fiscal 2429 year which increases any state agency customerâs costs for that 2430 fiscal year. 2431 (l)âProvide data center services that comply with 2432 applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and policies, 2433 including all applicable security, privacy, and auditing 2434 requirements. 2435 (m)âMaintain performance of the data center facilities by 2436 ensuring proper data backup; data backup recovery; disaster 2437 recovery; and appropriate security, power, cooling, fire 2438 suppression, and capacity. 2439 (n)âSubmit invoices to state agency customers. 2440 (o)âAs funded in the General Appropriations Act, provide 2441 data center services to state agencies from multiple facilities. 2442 (2)âUnless exempt from the requirement to use the state 2443 data center pursuant to s. 282.201(1) or as authorized by the 2444 Legislature, a state agency may not do any of the following: 2445 (a)âTerminate services with the Northwest Regional Data 2446 Center without giving written notice of intent to terminate 2447 services 180 days before such termination. 2448 (b)âProcure third-party cloud-computing services without 2449 evaluating the cloud-computing services provided by the 2450 Northwest Regional Data Center. 2451 (c)âExceed 30 days from receipt of approved invoices to 2452 remit payment for state data center services provided by the 2453 Northwest Regional Data Center. 2454 (3)âThe Northwest Regional Data Centerâs authority to 2455 provide data center services to its state agency customers may 2456 be terminated if: 2457 (a)âThe center requests such termination to the Board of 2458 Governors, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 2459 House of Representatives; or 2460 (b)âThe center fails to comply with the provisions of this 2461 section. 2462 (4)âThe Northwest Regional Data Center is the lead entity 2463 responsible for creating, operating, and managing, including the 2464 research conducted by, the Florida Behavioral Health Care Data 2465 Repository as established by this subsection. 2466 (a)âThe purpose of the data repository is to create a 2467 centralized system for: 2468 1.âCollecting and analyzing existing statewide behavioral 2469 health care data to: 2470 a.âBetter understand the scope of and trends in behavioral 2471 health services, spending, and outcomes to improve patient care 2472 and enhance the efficiency and effectiveness of behavioral 2473 health services; 2474 b.âBetter understand the scope of, trends in, and 2475 relationship between behavioral health, criminal justice, 2476 incarceration, and the use of behavioral health services as a 2477 diversion from incarceration for individuals with mental 2478 illness; and 2479 c.âEnhance the collection and coordination of treatment and 2480 outcome information as an ongoing evidence base for research and 2481 education related to behavioral health. 2482 2.âDeveloping useful data analytics, economic metrics, and 2483 visual representations of such analytics and metrics to inform 2484 relevant state agencies and the Legislature of data and trends 2485 in behavioral health. 2486 (b)âThe Northwest Regional Data Center shall develop, in 2487 collaboration with the Data Analysis Committee of the Commission 2488 on Mental Health and Substance Use Disorder created under s. 2489 394.9086 and with relevant stakeholders, a plan that includes 2490 all of the following: 2491 1.âA project plan that describes the technology, 2492 methodology, timeline, cost, and resources necessary to create a 2493 centralized, integrated, and coordinated data system. 2494 2.âA proposed governance structure to oversee the 2495 implementation and operations of the repository. 2496 3.âAn integration strategy to incorporate existing data 2497 from relevant state agencies, including, but not limited to, the 2498 Agency for Health Care Administration, the Department of 2499 Children and Families, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the 2500 Office of the State Courts Administrator, and the Department of 2501 Corrections. 2502 4.âIdentification of relevant data and metrics to support 2503 actionable information and ensure the efficient and responsible 2504 use of taxpayer dollars within behavioral health systems of 2505 care. 2506 5.âData security requirements for the repository. 2507 6.âThe structure and process that will be used to create an 2508 annual analysis and report that gives state agencies and the 2509 Legislature a better general understanding of trends and issues 2510 in the stateâs behavioral health systems of care and the trends 2511 and issues in behavioral health systems related to criminal 2512 justice treatment, diversion, and incarceration. 2513 (c)âBeginning December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, 2514 the Northwest Regional Data Center shall submit the developed 2515 trends and issues report under subparagraph (b)6. to the 2516 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 2517 House of Representatives. 2518 (5)âIf such authority is terminated, the center has 1 year 2519 to provide for the transition of its state agency customers to a 2520 qualified alternative cloud-based data center that meets the 2521 enterprise architecture standards established pursuant to this 2522 chapter. 2523 Section 21.âSubsection (4) of section 282.206, Florida 2524 Statutes, is amended to read: 2525 282.206âCloud-first policy in state agencies.â 2526 (4)âEach state agency shall develop a strategic plan to be 2527 updated annually to address its inventory of applications 2528 located at the state data center. Each agency shall submit the 2529 plan by October 15 of each year to DIGIT, the Office of Policy 2530 and Budget in the Executive Office of the Governor, and the 2531 chairs of the legislative appropriations committees, and the 2532 Northwest Regional Data Center. For each application, the plan 2533 must identify and document the feasibility, appropriateness, 2534 readiness, appropriate strategy, and high-level timeline for 2535 transition to a cloud-computing service based on the 2536 applicationâs quality, cost, and resource requirements. This 2537 information must be used to assist the state data center in 2538 making adjustments to its service offerings. 2539 Section 22.âSection 1004.649, Florida Statutes, is amended 2540 to read: 2541 1004.649âNorthwest Regional Data Center.âThere is created 2542 at Florida State University the Northwest Regional Data Center. 2543 The data center shall serve as the state data center as 2544 designated in s. 282.201 2545 (1)âFor the purpose of providing data center services to 2546 its state agency customers, the Northwest Regional Data Center 2547 is designated as a state data center for all state agencies and 2548 shall: 2549 (a)âOperate under a governance structure that represents 2550 its customers proportionally. 2551 (b)âMaintain an appropriate cost-allocation methodology 2552 that accurately bills state agency customers based solely on the 2553 actual direct and indirect costs of the services provided to 2554 state agency customers and ensures that, for any fiscal year, 2555 state agency customers are not subsidizing other customers of 2556 the data center. Such cost-allocation methodology must comply 2557 with applicable state and federal regulations concerning the 2558 distribution and use of state and federal funds. 2559 (c)âEnter into a service-level agreement with each state 2560 agency customer to provide services as defined and approved by 2561 the governing board of the center. At a minimum, such service 2562 level agreements must: 2563 1.âIdentify the parties and their roles, duties, and 2564 responsibilities under the agreement; 2565 2.âState the duration of the agreement term, which may not 2566 exceed 3 years, and specify the conditions for up to two 2567 optional 1-year renewals of the agreement before execution of a 2568 new agreement; 2569 3.âIdentify the scope of work; 2570 4.âEstablish the services to be provided, the business 2571 standards that must be met for each service, the cost of each 2572 service, and the process by which the business standards for 2573 each service are to be objectively measured and reported; 2574 5.âProvide a timely billing methodology for recovering the 2575 cost of services provided pursuant to s. 215.422; 2576 6.âProvide a procedure for modifying the service-level 2577 agreement to address any changes in projected costs of service; 2578 7.âInclude a right-to-audit clause to ensure that the 2579 parties to the agreement have access to records for audit 2580 purposes during the term of the service-level agreement; 2581 8.âIdentify the products or services to be delivered with 2582 sufficient specificity to permit an external financial or 2583 performance audit; 2584 9.âProvide that the service-level agreement may be 2585 terminated by either party for cause only after giving the other 2586 party notice in writing of the cause for termination and an 2587 opportunity for the other party to resolve the identified cause 2588 within a reasonable period; and 2589 10.âProvide state agency customer entities with access to 2590 applications, servers, network components, and other devices 2591 necessary for entities to perform business activities and 2592 functions and as defined and documented in a service-level 2593 agreement. 2594 (d)âIn its procurement process, show preference for cloud 2595 computing solutions that minimize or do not require the 2596 purchasing or financing of state data center infrastructure, 2597 that meet the needs of state agency customer entities, that 2598 reduce costs, and that meet or exceed the applicable state and 2599 federal laws, regulations, and standards for cybersecurity. 2600 (e)âAssist state agency customer entities in transitioning 2601 from state data center services to other third-party cloud 2602 computing services procured by a customer entity or by the 2603 Northwest Regional Data Center on behalf of the customer entity. 2604 (f)âProvide to the Board of Governors the total annual 2605 budget by major expenditure category, including, but not limited 2606 to, salaries, expenses, operating capital outlay, contracted 2607 services, or other personnel services by July 30 each fiscal 2608 year. 2609 (g)âProvide to each state agency customer its projected 2610 annual cost for providing the agreed-upon data center services 2611 by September 1 each fiscal year. 2612 (h)âProvide a plan for consideration by the Legislative 2613 Budget Commission if the governing body of the center approves 2614 the use of a billing rate schedule after the start of the fiscal 2615 year that increases any state agency customerâs costs for that 2616 fiscal year. 2617 (i)âProvide data center services that comply with 2618 applicable state and federal laws, regulations, and policies, 2619 including all applicable security, privacy, and auditing 2620 requirements. 2621 (j)âMaintain performance of the data center facilities by 2622 ensuring proper data backup; data backup recovery; disaster 2623 recovery; and appropriate security, power, cooling, fire 2624 suppression, and capacity. 2625 (k)âPrepare and submit state agency customer invoices to 2626 the Department of Management Services for approval. Upon 2627 approval or by default pursuant to s. 282.201(5), submit 2628 invoices to state agency customers. 2629 (l)âAs funded in the General Appropriations Act, provide 2630 data center services to state agencies from multiple facilities. 2631 (2)âUnless exempt from the requirement to use the state 2632 data center pursuant to s. 282.201(2) or as authorized by the 2633 Legislature, a state agency may not do any of the following: 2634 (a)âTerminate services with the Northwest Regional Data 2635 Center without giving written notice of intent to terminate 2636 services 180 days before such termination. 2637 (b)âProcure third-party cloud-computing services without 2638 evaluating the cloud-computing services provided by the 2639 Northwest Regional Data Center. 2640 (c)âExceed 30 days from receipt of approved invoices to 2641 remit payment for state data center services provided by the 2642 Northwest Regional Data Center. 2643 (3)âThe Northwest Regional Data Centerâs authority to 2644 provide data center services to its state agency customers may 2645 be terminated if: 2646 (a)âThe center requests such termination to the Board of 2647 Governors, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 2648 House of Representatives; or 2649 (b)âThe center fails to comply with the provisions of this 2650 section. 2651 (4)âThe Northwest Regional Data Center is the lead entity 2652 responsible for creating, operating, and managing, including the 2653 research conducted by, the Florida Behavioral Health Care Data 2654 Repository as established by this subsection. 2655 (a)âThe purpose of the data repository is to create a 2656 centralized system for: 2657 1.âCollecting and analyzing existing statewide behavioral 2658 health care data to: 2659 a.âBetter understand the scope of and trends in behavioral 2660 health services, spending, and outcomes to improve patient care 2661 and enhance the efficiency and effectiveness of behavioral 2662 health services; 2663 b.âBetter understand the scope of, trends in, and 2664 relationship between behavioral health, criminal justice, 2665 incarceration, and the use of behavioral health services as a 2666 diversion from incarceration for individuals with mental 2667 illness; and 2668 c.âEnhance the collection and coordination of treatment and 2669 outcome information as an ongoing evidence base for research and 2670 education related to behavioral health. 2671 2.âDeveloping useful data analytics, economic metrics, and 2672 visual representations of such analytics and metrics to inform 2673 relevant state agencies and the Legislature of data and trends 2674 in behavioral health. 2675 (b)âThe Northwest Regional Data Center shall develop, in 2676 collaboration with the Data Analysis Committee of the Commission 2677 on Mental Health and Substance Use Disorder created under s. 2678 394.9086 and with relevant stakeholders, a plan that includes 2679 all of the following: 2680 1.âA project plan that describes the technology, 2681 methodology, timeline, cost, and resources necessary to create a 2682 centralized, integrated, and coordinated data system. 2683 2.âA proposed governance structure to oversee the 2684 implementation and operations of the repository. 2685 3.âAn integration strategy to incorporate existing data 2686 from relevant state agencies, including, but not limited to, the 2687 Agency for Health Care Administration, the Department of 2688 Children and Families, the Department of Juvenile Justice, the 2689 Office of the State Courts Administrator, and the Department of 2690 Corrections. 2691 4.âIdentification of relevant data and metrics to support 2692 actionable information and ensure the efficient and responsible 2693 use of taxpayer dollars within behavioral health systems of 2694 care. 2695 5.âData security requirements for the repository. 2696 6.âThe structure and process that will be used to create an 2697 annual analysis and report that gives state agencies and the 2698 Legislature a better general understanding of trends and issues 2699 in the stateâs behavioral health systems of care and the trends 2700 and issues in behavioral health systems related to criminal 2701 justice treatment, diversion, and incarceration. 2702 (c)âBy December 1, 2025, the Northwest Regional Data 2703 Center, in collaboration with the Data Analysis Committee of the 2704 Commission on Mental Health and Substance Use Disorder, shall 2705 submit the developed plan for implementation and ongoing 2706 operation with a proposed budget to the Governor, the President 2707 of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives 2708 for review. 2709 (d)âBeginning December 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, 2710 the Northwest Regional Data Center shall submit the developed 2711 trends and issues report under subparagraph (b)6. to the 2712 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 2713 House of Representatives. 2714 (5)âIf such authority is terminated, the center has 1 year 2715 to provide for the transition of its state agency customers to a 2716 qualified alternative cloud-based data center that meets the 2717 enterprise architecture standards established by the Florida 2718 Digital Service. 2719 Section 23.âSection 287.0583, Florida Statutes, is created 2720 to read: 2721 287.0583âContract requirements for information technology 2722 commodities or services.âA contract for information technology 2723 commodities or services involving the development, 2724 customization, implementation, integration, support, or 2725 maintenance of software systems, applications, platforms, or 2726 related services must include provisions ensuring all of the 2727 following: 2728 (1)âAny data created, processed, or maintained under the 2729 contract is portable and can be extracted in a machine-readable 2730 format upon request. 2731 (2)âThe vendor will provide, upon request, comprehensive 2732 operational documentation sufficient to allow continued 2733 operation and maintenance by the agency or a new vendor. 2734 (3)âThe vendor will provide, upon request, reasonable 2735 assistance and support during a transition to the agency or to a 2736 new vendor. 2737 (4)âAll anticipated software license fees, license renewal 2738 fees, and operation and maintenance costs are documented in 2739 detail. If exact figures are not feasible, the vendor must 2740 provide a reasonable cost range. 2741 Section 24.âSection 287.0591, Florida Statutes, is amended 2742 to read: 2743 287.0591âInformation technology; vendor disqualification.â 2744 (1)(a)âAny competitive solicitation issued by the 2745 department for a state term contract for information technology 2746 commodities must include a term that does not exceed 48 months. 2747 (b)(2)âAny competitive solicitation issued by the 2748 department for a state term contract for information technology 2749 consultant services or information technology staff augmentation 2750 contractual services must include a term that does not exceed 48 2751 months. 2752 (c)(3)âThe department may execute a state term contract for 2753 information technology commodities, consultant services, or 2754 staff augmentation contractual services that exceeds the 48 2755 month requirement if the Secretary of Management Services and 2756 the state chief information officer certify in writing to the 2757 Executive Office of the Governor that a longer contract term is 2758 in the best interest of the state. 2759 (2)(4)âIf the department issues a competitive solicitation 2760 for information technology commodities, consultant services, or 2761 staff augmentation contractual services, the department shall 2762 coordinate with the Division of Integrated Government Innovation 2763 and Technology within the Executive Office of the Governor 2764 Florida Digital Service within the department shall participate 2765 in such solicitations. Such coordination must include reviewing 2766 the solicitation specifications to verify compliance with 2767 enterprise architecture and cybersecurity standards, evaluating 2768 vendor responses under established criteria, answering vendor 2769 questions, and providing any other technical expertise 2770 necessary. 2771 (3)(a)(5)âIf an agency issues a request for quote to 2772 purchase information technology commodities, information 2773 technology consultant services, or information technology staff 2774 augmentation contractual services from the state term contract 2775 which meets the CATEGORY TWO threshold amount, but is less than 2776 the CATEGORY FOUR threshold amount:, 2777 1.âFor any contract with 25 approved vendors or fewer, the 2778 agency must issue a request for quote to all vendors approved to 2779 provide such commodity or service. 2780 2.âFor any contract with more than 25 approved vendors, the 2781 agency must issue a request for quote to at least 25 of the 2782 vendors approved to provide such commodity or contractual 2783 service. 2784 (b)âThe agency shall maintain a copy of the request for 2785 quote, the identity of the vendors that were sent the request 2786 for quote, and any vendor response to the request for quote for 2787 2 years after the date of issuance of the purchase order. 2788 (c)âUse of a request for quote does not constitute a 2789 decision or intended decision that is subject to protest under 2790 s. 120.57(3). 2791 (4)(a)âAn agency issuing a request for quote to purchase 2792 information technology commodities, information technology 2793 consultant services, or information technology staff 2794 augmentation contractual services from the state term contract 2795 which exceeds the CATEGORY FOUR threshold amount is subject to 2796 public records requirements pursuant to s. 287.057. 2797 Additionally, an agency shall publish: 2798 1.âThe request for quote for a minimum of 10 days before 2799 executing the purchase order; and 2800 2.âThe name of the vendor awarded the purchase order. 2801 (b)âThe agency shall maintain a copy of the request for 2802 quote, the identity of the vendors that were sent the request 2803 for quote, and all vendor responses to the request for quote for 2804 2 years after the date of issuance of the purchase order. 2805 (c)âUse of a request for quote does not constitute a 2806 decision or intended decision that is subject to protest under 2807 s. 120.57(3). 2808 (5)âA state agency may request the Division of Integrated 2809 Government Innovation and Technology within the Executive Office 2810 of the Governor for procurement advisory and review services 2811 pursuant to s. 282.0061. 2812 (6)(a)âBeginning October 1, 2021, and Each October 1 2813 thereafter, the department shall prequalify firms and 2814 individuals to provide information technology staff augmentation 2815 contractual services and information technology commodities on 2816 state term contract. 2817 (b)âIn order to prequalify a firm or individual for 2818 participation on the state term contract, the department must 2819 consider, at a minimum, the capability, experience, and past 2820 performance record of the firm or individual. 2821 (c)âA firm or individual removed from the source of supply 2822 pursuant to s. 287.042(1)(b) or placed on a disqualified vendor 2823 list pursuant to s. 287.133 or s. 287.134 is immediately 2824 disqualified from state term contract eligibility. 2825 (d)âOnce a firm or individual has been prequalified to 2826 provide information technology staff augmentation contractual 2827 services or information technology commodities on state term 2828 contract, the firm or individual may respond to requests for 2829 quotes from an agency to provide such services. 2830 Section 25.âSubsection (2) of section 20.22, Florida 2831 Statutes, is amended to read: 2832 20.22âDepartment of Management Services.âThere is created a 2833 Department of Management Services. 2834 (2)âThe following divisions, programs, and services within 2835 the Department of Management Services are established: 2836 (a)âFacilities Program. 2837 (b)â The Florida Digital Service. 2838 (c)âWorkforce Program. 2839 (c)1.(d)1.âSupport Program. 2840 2.âFederal Property Assistance Program. 2841 (d)(e)âAdministration Program. 2842 (e)(f)âDivision of Administrative Hearings. 2843 (f)(g)âDivision of Retirement. 2844 (g)(h)âDivision of State Group Insurance. 2845 (h)(i)âDivision of Telecommunications. 2846 Section 26.âSubsections (1), (5), (7), and (8) of section 2847 282.802, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2848 282.802âGovernment Technology Modernization Council.â 2849 (1)âThe Government Technology Modernization Council, an 2850 advisory council as defined in s. 20.03(7), is located created 2851 within DIGIT the department. Except as otherwise provided in 2852 this section, the advisory council shall operate in a manner 2853 consistent with s. 20.052. 2854 (5)âThe state chief information officer Secretary of 2855 Management Services, or his or her designee, shall serve as the 2856 ex officio, nonvoting executive director of the council. 2857 (7)(a)âThe council shall meet at least quarterly to: 2858 (a)1.âRecommend legislative and administrative actions that 2859 the Legislature and state agencies as defined in s. 282.0041 s. 2860 282.318(2) may take to promote the development of data 2861 modernization in this state. 2862 (b)2.âAssess and provide guidance on necessary legislative 2863 reforms and the creation of a state code of ethics for 2864 artificial intelligence systems in state government. 2865 (c)3.âAssess the effect of automated decision systems or 2866 identity management on constitutional and other legal rights, 2867 duties, and privileges of residents of this state. 2868 (d)4.âEvaluate common standards for artificial intelligence 2869 safety and security measures, including the benefits of 2870 requiring disclosure of the digital provenance for all images 2871 and audio created using generative artificial intelligence as a 2872 means of revealing the origin and edit of the image or audio, as 2873 well as the best methods for such disclosure. 2874 (e)5.âAssess the manner in which governmental entities and 2875 the private sector are using artificial intelligence with a 2876 focus on opportunity areas for deployments in systems across 2877 this state. 2878 (f)6.âDetermine the manner in which artificial intelligence 2879 is being exploited by bad actors, including foreign countries of 2880 concern as defined in s. 287.138(1). 2881 (g)7.âEvaluate the need for curriculum to prepare school 2882 age audiences with the digital media and visual literacy skills 2883 needed to navigate the digital information landscape. 2884 (b)âAt least one quarterly meeting of the council must be a 2885 joint meeting with the Florida Cybersecurity Advisory Council. 2886 (8)âBy December 31, 2024, and Each December 31 thereafter, 2887 the council shall submit to the Governor, the President of the 2888 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives any 2889 legislative recommendations considered necessary by the council 2890 to modernize government technology, including: 2891 (a)âRecommendations for policies necessary to: 2892 1.âAccelerate adoption of technologies that will increase 2893 productivity of state enterprise information technology systems, 2894 improve customer service levels of government, and reduce 2895 administrative or operating costs. 2896 2.âPromote the development and deployment of artificial 2897 intelligence systems, financial technology, education 2898 technology, or other enterprise management software in this 2899 state. 2900 3.âProtect Floridians from bad actors who use artificial 2901 intelligence. 2902 (b)âAny other information the council considers relevant. 2903 Section 27.âSection 282.604, Florida Statutes, is amended 2904 to read: 2905 282.604âAdoption of rules.âDIGIT The Department of 2906 Management Services shall, with input from stakeholders, adopt 2907 rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 for the development, 2908 procurement, maintenance, and use of accessible electronic 2909 information technology by governmental units. 2910 Section 28.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 2911 443.1113, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2912 443.1113âReemployment Assistance Claims and Benefits 2913 Information System.â 2914 (4) 2915 (b)âThe department shall seek input on recommended 2916 enhancements from, at a minimum, the following entities: 2917 1.âThe Division of Integrated Government Innovation and 2918 Technology within the Executive Office of the Governor Florida 2919 Digital Service within the Department of Management Services. 2920 2.âThe General Tax Administration Program Office within the 2921 Department of Revenue. 2922 3.âThe Division of Accounting and Auditing within the 2923 Department of Financial Services. 2924 Section 29.âSubsection (5) of section 943.0415, Florida 2925 Statutes, is amended to read: 2926 943.0415âCybercrime Office.âThere is created within the 2927 Department of Law Enforcement the Cybercrime Office. The office 2928 may: 2929 (5)âConsult with the state chief information security 2930 officer of the Division of Integrated Government Innovation and 2931 Technology within the Executive Office of the Governor Florida 2932 Digital Service within the Department of Management Services in 2933 the adoption of rules relating to the information technology 2934 security provisions in s. 282.318. 2935 Section 30.âSubsection (3) of section 1004.444, Florida 2936 Statutes, is amended to read: 2937 1004.444âFlorida Center for Cybersecurity.â 2938 (3)âUpon receiving a request for assistance from a the 2939 Department of Management Services, the Florida Digital Service, 2940 or another state agency, the center is authorized, but may not 2941 be compelled by the agency, to conduct, consult on, or otherwise 2942 assist any state-funded initiatives related to: 2943 (a)âCybersecurity training, professional development, and 2944 education for state and local government employees, including 2945 school districts and the judicial branch; and 2946 (b)âIncreasing the cybersecurity effectiveness of the 2947 stateâs and local governmentsâ technology platforms and 2948 infrastructure, including school districts and the judicial 2949 branch. 2950 Section 31.âThis act shall take effect January 5, 2027.